GREAT ATTRACTION!
OR
THE DOCTOR MOST OUDACIOUSLY TUCK IN.
A SKETCH FROM REAL LIFE.
Oh
, Jim, the great attraction's come to town!
gasped a little fellow to his friend, as he was
hastening
home to impart the glad tidings to his family.
The which? inquired Jim, turning suddenly
round; his eyes, mouth, and every feature expressive
of the liveliest curiosity.
Jim's informant had no time to turrey for a
more particular explanation, but hurried on, leaving
the latter to infer that something extraordinary was
to pay, from some broken sentences which he uttered
about showdown to Capt. Brown's Tavernbig
pictersDr. Jones, &c.,which could not be
distinctly
heard at so great and rapidly increasing
distance
.
But Jim did hear showCapt. Brown's
tavern, and he had a clue to the matter.
Away dashed Jimand when he arrived at the
aforesaid tavern, he beheld a crowd of gazing men
and boys gathered in the bar-room, looking with all
their might at a large poster, at the head of which
stood these magic words:
GREAT ATTRACTION!!
FOR TWO NIGHTS ONLY!!!
All was wonderment and curiosity, and Jim for once
experienced the inadequacy of the human capacity
for such extraordinary occasionshe could not make
out the printin himselfand his mind was totally
incapable of taking in and making use of half he
heard. What upon yeath is it? he asked of the
nearest. One said it was the great attraction from
New Yorkanother that it was the Fourth of July
on horsebacksome one else that it was all sorts
of a thing, and his curiosity was rather increased
than diminished when Dr. Jones, who chanced to
be there, volunteered to read it all off to the crowd,
if they would only keep silence. Then there was a
Babel of voices calling silence for several minutes.
Silence! till the doctor reads it, shouted one.
Silence, fellers, silence! bawled another.
Shet your mouth, Bill Parker, no body can't
hear nothin' for you.
Silence! silence! repeated a dozen at a time.
When they had become somewhat quiet, the
doctor
mounted a chair, and, after running the thing
over for a minute or two, during which the faces of
his audience indicated the strongest symptoms of
insupportable suspense, he read out in a full round
tone, and right off without spelling a word, the
whole bill, from Great Attraction, to
performances
to commence at half-past seven, precisely.
2
After which, with a patronising air peculiarly his
own, he condescended to explain the matter to his
eager listeners. He told them that it was a thing
called a circus, derived from circle for horses to
run round inthat it was a very wonderful thing
that circus-men were the most surprisen'est
creatures
he had ever met with anywherethat he had
seed a great many of them in Augusta, when
he was at college, and knew all about themthat
they could ride the swiftest horses without saddle
or bridle, on their headscould dance on wires
and ropes, could jump to all creation, could eat fire,
swallow broad-swords, and perform all manner of
antics. Many questions were pressed in regard to
the show, to all of which the doctor made the most
satisfactory answers, as one perfectly familiar with
such things, and the crowd dispersed to await the
advent of this, to them, eighth wonder of the world.
But we left Thomas Stullings on his way home to
announce the arrival of the show to the Stullings
family, who, we should not forget to inform the
reader, were people of consequence in Pineville.
Widow Stullings was richowned a fine plantation
and lots of negroesa circumstance which doubtless
enhanced the estimation in which her three amiable
daughters were held by the village beaux.
Oh, mother! guess what's come to town!
exclaimed
Thomas, as he dashed his hat into one chair
and threw himself into another, almost fainting for
want of breath.
I don't know, Tommy, replied the old lady,
raising her eyes from her sewing until she caught a
view of his flushed face, and observed his deep
respiration. Why, Laws-a-massy! what ails the
child? Is the Ingins ris again? she asked,
dropping
her work and rising from her seat.
No, mother, replied Tommy, as soon as he
could command sufficient breath, but something
else.
By this time the whole household were attracted
by Thomas's strange manner.
What is it, then, Thomas? demanded two or
three at the same time.
A great attractiona circus!
A what?
A circus, Dr. Jones saysa whole heap of
circus
riders.
Oh, la! is that all?why child your uncle Moses
was a circuit-rider, on the Green Meadow circuit, for
upwards of five years, until he went to live in the
Hogtown settlement, where he died, poor
Oh, no, mother, uncle Moses couldn't ride on
his head, and swallow broad-swords, could he?
Why, Thomas, you must be crazy! who ever
heard of sich a thing as preachers riding on their
heads, and
Ha, ha, shouted Tommy, these aint
preachers
,
mother, they're show-folks; Dr. Jones says so.
Little could be gathered from what Thomas had
to communicate. The old lady was sorely puzzled,
but the young ladies had learned enough to excite
their curiosity beyond the point of endurance; so it
was determined to despatch Thomas to request Dr.
Jones to call over and tell them all about it, as they
were quite sure he was perfectly conversant with the
whole matter. Accordingly the doctor was sent for,
and for once in his life his treatment proved
successful
.
He soon relieved the fit of curiosity into which
Thomas's news had thrown them, by relating all the
information which his travels, as well as his close
intimacy with the bill-poster of the company, who
had just arrived in town, enabled him to glean.
Doctor Peter Jones should be formally introduced
to the reader as the most important personage who
figures in our sketch. He was a well grown young
man, rather tall, with light gray eyes, abundantly
large for the ordinary purposes of that organ, whitish
eyebrows, and hair rather inclined to sorrel. There
were no particular indications of uncommon talent
in his countenance, and from a rather imperfect
knowledge of his developments, we should say that,
in his case, phrenology and physiognomy agreed.
Nevertheless the doctor was a firm believer in the
first of these sciences, in consequence of which he
was in the habit of cutting away his locks about his
forehead and temples, in order to acquit himself of
a forehead villanously low.
The doctor was not yet in possession of a
sheep-skin
license to practise the healing art, nor were the
public much indebted to him for the exercise of his
medical skill, though he had been known to pull a
tooth or so, and on one occasion was supposed to
have saved the life of a negro who had been kicked
by a wayward mule, by a resort to his favourite
remedy
phlebotomy
. He had attended one course
of lectures at Augusta, and returned to his native
village, rich in all the polish and refinement which
a winter's residence in that Philadelphia of the south
affords such ample opportunities for acquiring. Such
had been his improvement in point of deportment,
dress, and conversation, that his former
acquaintances
would scarcely have recognised him in his
new guise, had they met him anywhere else than
at home. He no longer tolerated Kentucky-jeans
and thick-soled shoes, but a graceful, shining blue
cloth coat of the latest cut, pants to match, and a
pair of stilt-heeled boots, with a black velvet cap,
which sat jauntily on the top of his head, the visor
almost concealing his eyes, a walking-cane of the
most delicate polish, and, of nights or rainy days, a
professional looking camblet wrapper, constituted
his usual costume. All these little advantages
conspired
to give the doctor undisputed precedence in
the estimation of the young ladies, a fact of which
he was not a little vain, and adding to it the
reputation
he had acquired for smartness, which is so
generally conceded to students, whether of medicine
or other professions, the doctor could not but feel
himself, to use one of his own polished expressions
bully of the tan-yard.
As leading characters generally direct public
opinion in all matters of propriety, fashion, &c., the
stand which the doctor had taken in relation to the
circus, now for the first time introduced into the
village, was calculated to make it exceedingly
popular, and, of course, vastly to benefit the little
troop of equestrians, who had resorted to the
expedient
of travelling, to avoid the heavy expenses of
2*
wintering in the large cities of the North. The
doctor obtained from the avant-courier of the
company
a few small bills, which he industriously
circulated
among the ladies of his acquaintance, who
had almost unanimously resolved to attend, and the
whole village gave note of dreadful preparation
for the coming fte.
Before night a light wagon, drawn by two spotted
horses, drove up to the tavern. In an hour all
Pineville
was rife with rumours,each had made some
discovery, and each had some marvel to relate
few slept that night, and by ten o'clock the next
morning the news had spread far and wide into the
surrounding country that a great show was to come
off in town that evening. During the day the
balance
of the company arrived, and long before night
the canvass pavilion was reared. Blasts of the
French horn, and scrapings of fiddle-strings, might
be heard within, while the doctor and some two or
three smart negroes belonging to the hotel, the only
ones who had free ingress, might be seen passing
in and out; which circumstance greatly excited the
envy of the little boys, who all seemed to have
business
on this particular occasion in the
neighbourhood
of Captain Brown's back lot. The doctor had
given them all the information which such
interesting
strangers usually require about saw-dust,
tan-bark
,
and the like, and every thing was progressing
finely, as the shades of evening drew on. He
announced
in a confidential manner to the manager,
the extent to which his personal influence had been
exerted, and concluded, as he left the pavilion, by
assuring that gentleman that he might expect a
perfect
jam
, a technical term upon which he placed
considerable emphasis.
It was night. As if Christmas, New Year, and
the Fourth of July had all come togetherhad all
been concentrated into one glorious holidaythe
people, town and country, white and black, old
and young, came trooping towards the enclosure,
which was now brilliantly lighted up, and from
which burst a loud peal of music, such as never had
been heard before in Pineville. The effect was
electric; none within hearing of that sonorous
metal blowing martial sounds, could resist its
thrilling
appeals. Those who had thrown the half dollar
in the scale against the show and found the latter
wanting, now felt their pockets kick the beam,
and resolved to go it any how.
The negroes were frantic,the older ones might
be seen in all directions giving way to the impulse
in the most highly concentrated double shuffles,
while the little niggerlings sprang into the air,
clapped their hands, shouted, or lay down and
rolled in an agony of delight. Troops were
pressing
to the yet unopened entrance, when suddenly a
loud report was heard, and a brilliant skyrocket shot
far up into the star-lit heavens, burst in air, and
came showering down in innumerable coruscant
stars of variegated fire. This marvellous
phenomenon
was hailed with screams from the more timid
sex, rather coarser ejaculations of surprise from the
men, and shouts from the boys and negroes. But
the sensation which it had produced was suddenly
interrupted by the opening of the doors of the show.
And then there was such a rush, such a scrambling
to be first, and such a changing of money!
Of course the doctor was on the spot, but he had
been to Augusta and knew a thing or two about
circuses. He had purchased his tickets during the
day, and now stood with an air of exclusive
complacency
,
a little back from the throng, smiling at
the eagerness of the uninitiated crowd, occasionally
assuring the anxious bevy of pretty girls under his
care, that they need not be alarmed, as he had taken
the precaution to secure their seats, which, he said,
was the universal custom in Augusta. At length
the way being somewhat cleared, the doctor made
his grand entree, at the head of about half a dozen
young ladies, all dressed and bedizened off in the
latest and most exquisite fashion, with flowing
headdresses
,
and many other little killing appliances of
the toilette, which showed to great advantage, and
rendered them as irresistible to the beaux, as a
phalanx
of grenadiers. The doctor felt the importance
of his position,they were the observed of all
observers, and he the observed of them; at least
he made himself so, for he flew about them with the
graceful agility of a professor of the poetry of
motion
,
ordering off a little gang of urchins who had
taken possession of his front bench, informing them,
in a voice loud enough to be heard above all the
confusion, that he had secured them seats from
the manager himself.
Some time elapsed, during which the crowd,
which was really immense, settled down into their
seats, and feasted their eyes on the wonders of the
amphitheatre, and drank in the rich tones of a very
respectable band for a travelling circus. The doctor,
in the mean time, entertained the ladies and those in
his immediate vicinity, by pointing out to them the
various fixtures of the ring, explaining their
purposes
,
and in some measure anticipating their
enjoyment
,
by relating what was to take place.
The audience had not yet grown impatient, when
a tall, pale-faced mulatto, his hair brushed up to a
cone, with an unreasonably long frock-coat, and a
pair of boots with red morocco tops, which he wore
over the legs of his pantaloons, rushed suddenly
from behind a canvass curtain in the rear, threw
open the low enclosure of the ring, and as suddenly
disappeared. What did all that mean?
Astonishment
was depicted in every countenance, but this
soon gave place to amazement; for the next
moment
,
a loud blast from the band,and in they
came,the horses leaping furiously into the ring,
while their riders, dressed in their gaudy costumes,
all glittering with silver and gold, with their white
waving plumes and flowing sashes, looked like so
many knights of the olden time. In their rear, and
on a horse so small that he would perhaps have
been overlooked, was the clown, who, as soon as
he entered the ring, shouted out, Come along
here, all my equestrian performancers! Ranged
in a line across the ring, each young gentleman
doffed his beaver, and made a graceful obeisance to
the audience; then, suddenly wheeling off, they
dashed round the ring at the top of their speed,
which set the ladies to holding their breath, and the
children to grasping their parents' knees or arms,
whichever were handiest, and some whimpered a
little; but upon being told that they should go right
straight home if they didn't be good, they drew
closer and were quiet.
Oh, my gracious! gasped Miss Mary Stullings,
as one of the horses made a slight stumble.
Don't be scared, Miss Mary, it's only the grand
entree.
But wont they fall off, doctor?
Not a bit, they wontthey're used to it, they
don't never fall off.
Oh, what a pretty little boy! said Miss
Johnson
;
he's just like Coopid, for all the world.
Oh, pa! look at that spotted man,his horse
can go just as fast as any, can't he, pa? What's he
got them long red things sticking up in his head for,
pasay, pa?
But pa was too deeply engaged to hear or answer
these interesting queries.
No, you don't! shouted the spotted man, as he
reigned his horse across the ring from the rear and
placed him in front of the flying troopthis child
aint to be beat, no how you can fix it!
A loud burst of laughter followed this ruse of the
clown, which was prolonged by the negroes from
the corner where they sat stowed away like a pile
of bricks. Just as the audience were getting dizzy
at the incessant and impetuous whirl of men and
horses before them, the troop suddenly came to a
halt, and, at the word, all the elegantly caparisoned
horses extended themselves upon the ground, as if
to rest from the fatigue which they had so lately
undergone. All but the clown's were perfectly
docile
he
found considerable difficulty in managing
his horse. When he bore down its neck it would
switch its tail, and when he stood on its tail it would
raise its head; which refractory and very ungenteel
conduct, he reprehended in strong terms, but all to
no purpose. Finally, a downright quarrel ensued
between them; and, while the horse chased him
round the ring, he called lustily to his master to
take him off, remarking that he held biting and
kicking to be extremely vulgar, and would fight no
one who practised such foul play. This difficulty
settled, the troop again mounted, made another
respectful
obeisance, and retired amid the shouts and
cheers of the delighted audience.
The time which elapsed between this fte and the
next, was passed in conversation. The doctor
reminded
the ladies that that was nothing to what he
had seen in Augusta. The ladies thought it was a
dreadful pretty sight, if they didn't skare one so.
The doctor begged them not to
be
skared, and
assured
them that there was not the least particle
of danger.
Miss Johnson desired to know of Miss Rogers,
which of the circus-men she liked the best.
Oh, that tall one, with the black curly hair; I
do think he is the handsomest young gentleman I
ever saw.
Oh no, I think that one with the white silk
jacket and blue sash is a great deal handsomer
and he looked over here so hard, said Miss
Stullings
.
Why you all can't tell how they look, at night,
dressed up so, remarked the doctor. That's
Howard, you mean, Miss Mary, and he's
pockmarked
as the mischief.
Ha, ha! laughed Miss Rogers, leaning back,
and placing her handkerchief to her mouth,the
doctor is jealous.
No, I aint, replied the doctor.
Aint you 'shamed, Lucy, said Miss Mary,
colouring
at the same time that she sent a look of
reproach towards Miss Rogers.
If you could only see them by day-light, in their
common clothes, said the doctor; but he was
interrupted
by that long-faced mulatto whom we have
before described, who now made his appearance
with a white horse, and, directly after him, came
the ring-master, with a long whip, followed by the
clown, who announced his coming by shouting
Come along here, Mr. Callahan, we'll have a little
bit of your fun!
Now there was a buzz throughout the audience
the music struck up, and away went Mr. Callahan,
standing erect on his horse and throwing himself
into all manner of graceful attitudesnow looking
back, as if he had left something behindnow
pointing
ahead, as if he saw something in frontnow on
one leg, then on the other, and finally brought his
fun to a close by making several lofty leaps, his
horse at full speed, over whips, hoops, garters,
canvass
,
&c., &c.the clown all the while keeping up
a running conversation with his master, the horse,
and the rest of the companysaying many witty
things, which kept the whole audience convulsed
with laughter.
Next came the spring-board, which the doctor at
once recognised, and the whole troop were engaged
for some twenty minutes, in feats of ground and
lofty tumbling, each one of which elicited torrents
of applause; and the doctor having introduced the
more fashionable mode of expressing approbation,
the clapping of hands had by this time become very
general. The clown failed in every attempt.
Why, pa, said one little fellow who had
watched the spring-board performances for some
time with a countenance of painful seriousness,
that spotted man's a fool, aint he?
Yes, my son, he's a very good fool.
What do the people clap their hands so for,
pa?
They are clapping the performers, because they
do so well.
Just then it came the clown's turn to throw a
somerset over the back of a chair, instead of which,
he jumped awkwardly against it, and pitched chair
and all on the ground; then springing up and
applying
a little saw-dust to his nose,his sovereign
remedy
for bruises and sprains,he walked off with
an air of triumph, as much as to saybeat that who
can!
A tremendous round of applause followed.
They clapped the spotted man because he done
it so bad,didn't they, pa,say, pa?
3
During the performance of these novel antics
there was a very general stretching of necks on the
lower seats, and the cry hats off in front! was
heard from all quarters. On a front seat, in the
very thickest of the crowd, sat a fellow well known
as fighting Bill Sweeny, with one of those ponderous
structures of wool and rabbit's fur on his head,
denominated
a bell-crowned hat, but rather more
resembling
an inverted church-bell, than the modern
article designed for the covering of the dome of
thought. Bill gloried in his celebrity as bully of
the county, and such was the obstinacy of his nature,
and so much did he delight in an opportunity of
picking
up a fight, that he would not have removed that
hat without one, though it had eclipsed the view of
one half the audience. When asked to just please
to take it off, Mr. Sweeny, in the gentlest and most
persuasive tone possible, his reply was a nudge of
the elbow, and, oh go to hll, will you?
The performances went on. Bill sat with his
hands thrust in his pockets, intently watching every
movement, occasionally laughing and swearing to
himself, how smart they
is!
Presently, just as
the clown was doing eels in the mud with such
rapid velocity that he looked for all the world
like some great spotted snake, writhing and twisting
in wildest contortions, Bill felt and heard a
thundering
,
crashing pressure from above, and the next
moment
all was darkness to him, while the shouts and
yells of the audience fell in smothered tones upon
his ears. His first impression was that the pavilion
had fallen in; but as he sprang from his seat and
found his arms firmly pinioned behind, and the
shouting
increased, he was at once convinced that the
boys had been projectin' with him. Mad with
rage, he leaped like a cat into the ringhis arms
still tied and his hat resting upon his shoulders, as if
his neck and part of his head had actually been driven
into his bodyshouting as well as he could for the
obstruction of his head-stallUnloose me! unloose
me, I say! and I'll whoop the whole belin' of ye!
An effort was made to get him out of the ring by
those whom the confusion had thrown into itthe
circus-men taking no part in the fray. Not being
able to get his hands to his head, he was still in
darkness
;
and, as his next friend, a drunken bully of
a fellow, approached him withHere, Billy, don't
be so fractiousI's your friend, you knows I ishe
gave him such a kick on the shins as set them
together
by the ears in a twinkling. Bill had broken the
cord that bound his arms, and now they had it, good
Georgia fashionbest man on top.
Notwithstanding
he was muzzled, the disadvantages under which
he fought were not so considerable as one might
suppose
for
if he was deprived of the use of his mouth,
his eyes were equally out of harm's way, while his
experience enabled him to feel in the right place for
those of his antagonist.
There was some confusion among the audience
some of the ladies were for retiring,but the manager
requested all to keep their seats, while the doctor
called upon the gentlemen present to part the two
bullies who were now making the tan and saw-dust
fly at a tremendous rate. Some dozen volunteered
their services, the doctor urging them onbut the
Saceny blood was rizand blind not only with
rage, but by reason of his hat still being over his
eyes, he fought at random and with desperation;
and for a few minutes there was ground and lofty
tumbling with a vengeance. But poor Bill was
forced to strike to superior numbers, and was borne
out of the ring, where he was finally pacified, after
his hat had been removed; which, however, was
much harder to come off than it had been to go on.
It required a long pull and a strong pullindeed
some fears were entertained of his neck giving way;
and the doctor, who had taken an active part in the
matter, after the fighting was over, facetiously
remarked
that it was a very fortunate circumstance that
Mr. Sweeny's nose, which had become tangled in
the lining, was not large, and was inclined to the
snub, or he should have been under the necessity of
sending home for his instruments.
Quiet having been once more restored, the
performances
were resumed. Several surprising acts of
horsemanship had been gone through with, the
audience
had nearly forgotten the late interruption, in
their enjoyment of the evening's entertainments, and
the clown was taking a little ride to himself, to the
tune of a little frog would a wooing go, when in
tumbled another man with a bell-crowned hat, almost
under the horse's feet! The music ceasedthe horse
came to a halt, and the clown desired the man to
leave the ring. But the fellow scrambled up and
walked as well as he could (for he was evidently
very drunk) still further into the forbidden circle,
and said, between a hiccup and a drunken leer, that
he had come to ride.
Who-o-o-o! exclaimed the clown
you
ride
a circus-horse!did you
ever
hear such insurance?
I say, Spotty
Mr. Merryman, if you please.
Well, Mr. Merryman, if you please, wont you
give me a ride?
Who-o-o-o! you must go out of here, I tell you.
The doctor could not sit still. Now that's too
bad, said he. Who is that drunken fellow, now,
come to kick up another fuss? If he was in
Augusta
,
they'd have him in the guard-house in less
than no time.
I paid my half dollar to come in here, and I'm
guine to have a ride or a fight, one. I doesn't pay
money to see other people ride, myself.
I'll call master. Master-r-r-r!
Fetch him out, if you've got any grudge agin
him, and I'll lick him too, said the man with the
bell-crowned hat, as he laid hold of the clown's leg
and began pulling him off the horse.
Murder! robbery! thieves! burglary and
kidnapping
!
shouted the clown.
The audience began to get alarmed againthe
doctor rose in his seat and called to the crowd to
turn him out! The ring-master came running in,
evidently much exasperated.
What's your name, sir? he demanded.
Eh?my name's Joe Peters, from Cracker's
Neck; do you want any thing out o' me? throwing
himself into a fighting attitude.
3*
If this man has any friends here, they will do
well to take him out before he gets into difficulty,
said the ring-master.
Yes, before I get hold of him, added the clown.
What's that you say, Spotty? said Joe, turning
to the last speaker.
Here the doctor excused himself to the ladies,
strode across the ring, and, laying his hand on Joe's
shoulder, peremptorily ordered him to leave the
enclosure
.
Joe turned, and placed himself in a defensive
position
.
Come, some of you gentle
men
, and help turn
this blackguard out of the show, said the doctor,
beckoning to a group of young men.
That's right, doctor, take him off before he gets
hurt, for maybe his ma don't know he's out.
Two young men came to the doctor's assistance,
but no sooner had the one in advance come close to
Joe, than he turned round and ran back, exclaiming
in an under-toneThat chap belongs to the show,
I can smell it on his breath!
The other followed his example, leaving the
doctor
alone to manage the intruder, who now staggered
up to him, and demanded if he wanted to fight. The
doctor grasped him by the shoulder, and had
succeeded
in forcing him some distance towards the
door, amidst the gibes and taunts of the audience,
when Joe became more resolute in his resistance,
declaring he
would
have a ride. A scuffle ensued,
during which a good part of the audience were
shouting
and cheering,some for the doctor and some for
Joebut there was no bounds to the tumult when
Joe, thrusting his head between the doctor's legs,
raised him off the ground, and dancing once or twice
round the ring, despite that gentleman's most
determined
efforts to dismount, which he manifested by
throwing his legs and arms about in the wildest
confusion
,
tossed him pell-mell on the heads of the
negroes
,
who squalled in concert with the general shout.
The doctor was dreadfully mortified at this
unlooked-for
reverse, and was about returning furiously
to the charge, when the clown approached him with
a significant wink.
Never mind, doctor, we'll get shut of himwe'll
give
him
a ride now. Then turning to Joe, who
was approaching the horse's heels, so, you want a
ride or a fight, do you, eh?
Yes, I want to ride that 'ere horse, Spotty, and
I'm the boy that's gwine to do it, too.
Well, sir, you've got to whip me first, putting
on a savage look and giving his teeth a grind.
I'm your boy, said Joe, I's another chick to
Bill Sweeny!
The hll you is!just give Bill Sweeny a fair
shake and he can whoop blue blazes out of ye,
though, growled the bully of the county, who was
again in his seat.
The clown put himself into a pugilistic attitude.
Joe was up to the mark, and, after a few passes, was
knocked heels over head on the tan.
Oh! exclaimed the ladies.
Serves him right! said the doctorhe'll get
his fill before he quits that ring.
Hurra, Joe! show your game! shouted
several
.
Give it to him, Spotty!
Oh, I want to go home, cried a timid little
fellow
,
from between his father's knees.
The next minute Spotty was down, who, as soon
as he struck the ground, shoutedEnough, take
him off! Then springing up and applying a
handful
of tan-bark to his nose, he extended the other
hand to Joe, remarking
You've whipt a gentleman, Joe,what's your
name?oh, ah, Peters! Mr. Joseph Peters, from
Cracker's Neck. You shall have a ride, Mr. Peters.
Will you have a fresh horse, Mr. Peters? Then
turning to the doctor, he continuedWe'll give
him a ridethere's more ways to kill a dog besides
choking him with butter, you know.
Joe was soon mounted, with his back towards the
horse's head. The clown called out for the hardest
trotting-tune the musicians could play. Pop went
the whip, and away flew the horses, Joe floundering
on his back like a drunken man in a quagmire.
Now, doctor, called out the clown, if you
want to see a cracker's neck cracked
Good enough for the fool, exclaimed the
doctor
with a conceited chuckle.
Oh, mercy! screamed the ladies, as Joe pitched
forward, and seemed only to hold to the neck of the
flying charger, with one arm.
But what was their astonishment when they beheld
him first rise to his knees on the saddle, then to his
feet, where he stood reeling and tottering as if he
was about to be dashed to the ground, while the
horse continued at the top of his speed.
Whoop-e-e! shouted the clown, if Joe aint on
his feet!
Good gracious! exclaimed the ladies. The
doctor stared, but said nothing.
Joe now dropped the bridle, and said he felt warm.
Take off your coat to it, Mr. Peters, replied the
clown; you've got plenty of friends here.
Off came Joe's frock-coat and his bell-crowned
hat, and the general opinion was that his personal
appearance was much improved by the change. The
clown had donned the coat and hat, and now cut a
more ludicrous figure than ever, as he followed round
the ring, picking up the coats and vests which Joe
threw off one after the other to the number of twenty,
or more. At length Joe had come to the last vest,
and was unbuttoning his suspenders, when the clown
called out
Stop, Joe! stop! there's ladies here!
But off went the pants, while the clown, with his
hands over his face, continued
Stop! stop!oh, Joe! aint you ashamed of
yourself
?oh,
for shame!
Then uncovering his face, he beheld his man Joe
transformed into a woman, trigged out in a flounced
muslin, and a fashionable opera hat. This sudden
metamorphose was hailed with one universal squall
from the audience, while the clown shrank aghast
from the apparition of a wife from whom he had
absconded
.
But on went the horse amid the deafening
shout, when suddenly the female dress dropped from
the rider, and there stood Mr. Harrington revealed,
in all his gilt and spangles, who, after a few extra
feats, just to show them what Joe Peters, from
Cracker's
Neck could do, threw a backward somerset from
his horse and retired, amidst the reiterated
acclamations
of the audience.
The clown, who now presented the appearance of
a wonderfully corpulent man, having stuffed Joe's
coats, jackets, gown, &c., into the waist of his coat,
approached his master, with a chop-fallen air, and
inquired
Master, can you tell me why I'm very much like
our friend, the doctor?
No,why are you?
'Cause, said he, unbuttoning the coat and
letting
the garments fall at his feet'cause I feel a
great deal smaller than I did a while ago.
Such another shout as followed, never before
re-echoed
through the quiet streets and lanes of
Pineville
.
The doctor was in every mouthHurra for
the doctor!How do you feel now, doctor?
Is that the way they does in Augusta?When
you gwine to show agin, doctor, I's sure to come
and a hundred other such jeers were aimed at the
unfortunate doctor; who, mortified to such a degree
that he knew not what to do with himself, rose in his
seat and addressed the almost frantic multitude
It's a fact, ladies and gentle
men
I was most
oudaciously tuck in that timethat's a fact.
Fortunately, it was the last act of the
performances
,
for such was the ungovernable humour of
the crowd, after what had happened, that it would
have been utterly impossible to re-establish order
that night.
How matters were conducted on the following
nightpositively the last of the Great Attraction
in Pinevillewe have not learned; we have heard
it hinted, however, that Dr. Peter Jones did not
attend, though he was loudly called for by the
audience.
BOSS ANKLES,
THE MAN WHAT GOT BLOWED UP WITH A
SKY-RACKET.
Long
time ago, when Pineville was another sort
of a place to what it is nowI do not mean the
term in the superlative sense in which it is usually
applied, but in its literal meaningwhen, indeed, it
was a very different sort of a placelong before the
Great Attraction made its appearance, or Parson
Storr's Temperance Society was organized, and when
Dr. Peter Jones was a little flaxen-headed boy, it was
customary for Mr. Harley and Mr. Coonsey, and the rest
of the store-keepers, to have a little back room in the
rear of their stores, where they usually kept a barrel
of whisky or rum on tap, just merely for convenience
of sampling. It was the practice, in those days, to
take customers into the little back apartment, and
give them a sample or two of the liquor before
they commenced trading. Sometimes these samples
amounted to good round horns, but these were
only given to test the wearing qualities of the liquor,
for those who use the article assert, that some liquors
that are well enough to the taste, do not rest so well
on the stomach, especially when taken in large doses.
Among those who visited Pineville, there were not a
few connoisseurs in rum, some of whom often found
it impossible to get suited in the article short of a
trial of every store in town, at each of which they
obtained considerable samples, as an inducement to
expend a portion of the change which they had
brought with them to purchase homespun, calico,
salt, rum and tobacco, and such other truck as
their necessities called for.
Mr. Harley was a considerable store-keeper for the
time, and was one of the most accommodating sort
of men. He usually kept three or four different
barrels
on tap, and not only gave large samples, but
took every pains to suit the taste of his customers by
commending to them the liquor of each barrel. It
was, perhaps, owing to this circumstance, that his
door was usually surrounded with the various kinds
of vehicles then in use among the country people.
It was not uncommon to see a score of sore-backed,
wind-broken rosinantes, and as many burr-tailed
donkeys, hanging, as we say in Georgia, to the
horse-rack, with some eight or ten little carts, each
composed of two wheels and a quantity of pine staves,
drawn sometimes by a mule, sometimes by a pair of
critters, and not unfrequently by a single steer,
both the plural and singular number being guided by
means of a rope or chain about the horns, the method
by which cattle of the bovine genus are awkwardly
guided at the South, even at this day.
But the proprietors of these grotesque
establishments
were decidedly the rarest creatures in the
animal
kingdom. When they came in the morning
they looked the most harmless beings on earth; their
bilious-looking eyes, and tanney, shrivelled faces
4
except those who allowed their mother earth to enter
largely into their daily provender, of whom there were
not a few in those dayswore a meek and pensive
expression, which led one to doubt if the combative
principle in them found animal spirits sufficient to
nourish and keep it alive. But towards noon, when
they had indulged pretty freely in sampling Mr.
Harley's
liquor, they became quite another sort of beings,
and many a scene occurred about the store-door which
would have afforded ample field for the graphic pen
of the popular sketcher of Georgia Scenes and
Characters
.
Then might be seen the cadaverous
looking
wiregrass boy in his glory, as he leaped out into
the sand before the door, and tossing his linsey jacket
into the air, proclaimed himself the best man in the
county. Then, too, might be seen the torpid
clay-eater
,
his bloated, watery countenance illuminated by
the exhilarating qualities of Mr. Harley's rum, as he
closed in with his antagonist, and showed by his
performances
that he could eat clay as well in its animate
as in its inanimate form. Then there was such bitter
cursing and swearing, and biting, and gouging, and
such home-sent lickssuch a war of words among
the women, squalling among the little tallow-faced
scions(all under the influence of the samples)and
such a rearing and pitching, kicking and braying,
and spilling of carts, and turning things upside down
and breaking them, among the mules and cattleall
of which would afford us material for a thrilling scene,
were not the business of the present sketch to record
an affair of quite a different character.
On those occasionsgenerally Saturdays of each
weeka man or two was sure to get badly licked,
and towards evening a general evacuation of the
town took place. The different lanes leading out
of Pineville were studded with China trees, and it
was no unusual thing for Mr. Harley's customers to
become so oppressed with the heat on their way
home, that they were compelled to rest beneath the
friendly shade of the trees. There they were almost
certain to fall asleep, and from some reason or other
for they never could satisfactorily account to
themselves
for such indiscretionsslept so soundly that
they were as often waked by the rising sun of the
following morning, as by the dews of the
intervening
night. While thus wrapped in the embrace of
the drowsy god, they were often made the victims
of the village wags, who played such pranks upon
the unsuspecting sleepers, that they not unfrequently
awoke as thoroughly metamorphosed as was the
renowned Billy Button, and as much at a loss to
recognise themselves as her of whom the old ballad
speaks
There was a little woman, as I've heard tell,
Who went to market her eggs for to sell,
But who unfortunately fell asleep on the king's
high-way, and was afterwards only enabled to
identify herself by the aid of a favourite dog, of
whom she said
I've a little dog at home, and he knows me
And if it is me, he'll wag his little tail.
These marvellous mystifications were wrought in
various ways, by the use of the marking-pot and the
shears. Sometimes a fellow would wake to find
himself minus the pendulous portion of his upper
garment, together with the legs or some other
portion
of his unmentionables, and tattooed like a Carib
chief; another perhaps would rouse from his
slumbers
to find his face as black as lampblack and oil
could make it, his wearing apparel altered to an
entirely different fashion, and one side, if not his
entire head, cropped to the skin. Very few
permitted
themselves to get caught in this manner a second
time, but there was for ever some new victim
skulking
back into town under cover of the night, in order
to repair damages before venturing home to his
settlement
,
who, if he were discovered in season, was
sure to be regarded as a proper subject upon which
to practise all the deviltry that could be devised by
his mischievous tormentors.
One day, in mid-summer, a small party visited
Mr. Harley and sampled his liquor as usual, among
whom was an individual who answered to the name
of Boss Ankles. It was a matter of some
speculation
how he came by so singular and unmeaning a
nom de guerre
. There was nothing peculiar about
his ankles, save that they were uncommonly black,
and as he repudiated socks and straps, and was in
the habit of thrusting his legs somewhat farther
through his copperas-coloured linseys than fashion
required, he exhibited rather more of the native
shank than is usually exposed to view. The prefix
Boss was doubtless acquired from the fact of his
affecting to be a leading character in his settlement,
and Ankles was probably a corruption of his
surname
,
whatever it was. More than probable he
had forgotten the original himself, for he had been
called Boss Ankles, Mr. Ankles, Ankles, or Boss,
from time immemorial.
As we have intimated, Mr. Boss Ankles was in
the habit of taking some state upon himself both at
home and abroad, basing his claim to consideration
on the ground of his being a school-keeper and
a professor of music. He performed on the fife,
and taught the mysteries of Dillworth's
Spelling-book
to the rising generation of his settlement; but
it is not known that he ever aspired to any thing
higher in the scale of educational science.
Boss was what his neighbours called a
monstrous
ugly varmint. It would afford us pleasure
to set him before the reader, but degrees of ugliness
are only to be ascertained by comparison, and
having
nothing in nature with which to institute such
an investigation of Boss's frontispiece, we feel
confident
that we should fail in any attempt to do him
justice; we must, therefore, content ourself by
stating, that his face more nearly resembled some
distorted human visage than that of any particular
animal to which we can liken him. True, his eyes
somewhat resembled those of the owl; there was a
wildness of expression about those organs which
would have done credit to the bird; but here the
resemblance ceased, and as the beholder
contemplated
the next important feature, the mouth, he was
at a loss to decide which it resembled most, that of
the catfish or suckerit was decidedly fishy in its
structure, and seemed to combine the characteristic
4*
peculiarities of both the species above named.
Immensely
large at the base, the lips protruded
inordinately
,
and had a downward inclination, which,
together with his little red nose, large pale eyes,
standing in their circular fields of purple, high cheek
bones and long flaxen hair, rendered him an object
of curiosity.
We have said that Boss performed on the fife
so he did. On muster-days he was in great
requisition
in his beat, and when once he succeeded in
getting his mouth in readiness, few could beat him
on that soul-stirring, ear-piercing instrument. But
these performances were attended with much
inconvenience
to Boss, as he was obliged to consume some
time in crimping up and folding away the surplus
leather about his mouth, before he could adjust the
instrument to his lips, which, when he had arranged
them, resembled more the kicking end of a
squaretoed
boot with a hole in it, than any thing else we
can think of. When once snugly fixed, he retained
his mouth in the same pucker, and seldom took the
fife from his face during the parade, unless some one
chanced to pass with liquor, a temptation he could
not
resist. When music was again wanted, it was
necessary to give Boss a precautionary word in
advance
,
when he would turn his head under his left
arm until the plaiting process was again
accomplished
,
then, with a stamp or two of the foot to
mark time, he would strike up, perhaps, Yankee
Doodle, and away they marched again.
But our business now is not with the
militia-muster
,
or Boss's musical powers. Leaving these to form
the subjects of some future reminiscences of Pineville,
we will return to the evening of the mid-summer day
aforesaid.
There had been a considerable party in town that
day, but all had gone off unusually quietno
fighting
,
and none so drunk but that they knew the way
home. Boss had been among the last to leave town,
and was, perhaps, the heaviest sampler in the party
but he had gone long before sundown.
It was early in the evening, just after tea, that
some six or eight loungers of the town dropped into
the store as usualfor it was a sort of rendezvous
for idlers, as one might see by the mangled pine
boxes about the doorto interchange the news of
the day and smoke a few of Mr. Harley's cigars.
They had been engaged in such frivolous pastime
but a few minutes, when a very strange-looking
figure entered the door, and inquired for Mr.
Harley
.
Hellow, Boss, is that you? I thought you had
gone home long ago.
Why, Mr. Harley, I never was sarved such a
trick afore in all my born days!
Eh, what's the matter with you, Boss?
Man alive! can't you see? exclaimed Boss, as
he rolled up his great white eyes, and tried to suck
in a sigh with his hanging lips.
Where's your shoes? inquired Mr. Harley,
observing
that he was barefooted.
They tuck them toooh, they tuck every thing
they could lay their hands on, replied he.
And your hat? inquired Mr. Harley.
Oh, they tuck that too! Man alive, Mr. Harley,
they've tititiatiously ruinated me, so they is!
Who?
You knows as well as I does, Mr. Harley.
Have you been robbed, Boss? asked one.
Where did it happen? inquired another.
I'll tell you all how it was, replied Mr. Ankles,
grateful for the apparent sympathy of the crowd.
You see, gentle
men
, arter I left here to-day, I was
gwine right straight home with the truck what I
bought of Mr. Harley tied up in a bundle, and it was
monstrous heavy, and it was ding hot, too, down
thar in the lane, so I sot down to rest a bit under the
trees, and somehow or other I got asleep, andand
you can jest see what happened to me. Some
oudacious cus-o'thunder, continued he, warming up
as he approached the climax, jest come and tuck
my bundle, and the jug of spirits and every thing,
and left me in this here fix.
And stole your bundle and jug?'
Yes, and the very shoes off my feet, and my hat
off my head, as was a bran new one I bought here
to-day.
Well, that
was
rather a rough joke, that's a fact.
Man alive, I never heard of sich a oudacious
perceedin' in all my life. This town's got a
monstrous
bad name for meanery and shecoonery of all
sorts, but I never know'd they 'low'd pirates here
afore.
It truly is a bad business, Boss.
Jest look at my sitivationI can't go home in
this here fix. The folks would swar I was tossicated
I know they wouldthough I was only overcome
a little with the heat, and know'd jest as well what
I was about when I sot down under them trees as I
does now. It aint the valley of the plun er, but it's
the principle of the thing I looks at. Whar's the use
o' laws and preachin,' if people's to be sarved in this
way. Cus the luckwhat a pity I didn't wake up
thar'd been old works down thar in the lane if I'd
jest happen'd to come to 'bout that time. He
concluded
with a significant twist of his neck, at the
same time clinching his fist, and casting a wild scowl
round the room.
Never mind, Boss, you know accidents will
happen
.
Take something to drink, to keep you from
catching cold, and console yourself that it is no worse.
They might have taken your coat, you know.
To be sure they moughtthat's a fact, rejoined
Boss, with a stare of his owl-eyes, as much as to say
he wondered why they didn't.
Boss approved the precautionary suggestion of his
comforter, and the clerk having brought some liquor,
of which he took a good swig to keep off the cold,
he began to grow familiar, and, sideling up to the
counter, assumed a comfortable lounging position,
where he soon forgot his misfortunes in the social
enjoyment of the hour. He had a great deal to say
about matters and things in generalamong other
topics he dwelt upon the verdancy of his neighbours,
and the shecoonery which had been practised
upon them by the town-boys. For his own part, he
never got into that sort o' difficulty, for people
always knew who to project with.
Why thar's Bill Willsonyou know that ugly
cock-eyed feller, he continued, come down to the
settle
ment
tother day, with the legs of his trowsers
split clear up to the waistband and his coat-tail crapt
close off; all the hair off his head, and his face as
black as the very old blazes. He liked to skecred
his aunt Tobitha Biers out of her senses, and the dogs
tuck hold of him jest like he'd been some wild
varmint
.
`Ha, ha,' ses I, `Bill, you's been' ouch!
whew! man alive! what's that? shouted the
speaker
,
and he lifted his feet from under him so suddenly,
that he came near pitching on the floor. A lighted
cigar-stump had been, accidentally of course, rolled
against them. After the two or three first steps of a
fandango, and rubbing the spot with his hand, he
resumed his position, and would have taken up the
thread of his story, but a drink round was proposed
after the laugh had subsided, in which Boss had
joined out of pure politeness.
After the liquor, came cigarshis friends were
very particular to select a large one for Mr. Ankles.
Boss wallowed it in his mouth preparatory to
smoking
.
Biting off one end, he was about to light it,
when his attention was attracted by a single
India-cracker
,
as they are usually called, which was lying
upon the counter. Taking it up and examining it,
he asked
What on yeath is this?
That! why, that, said the one nearest him,
casting an inquiring look around, that's aa
Cigar-lighter, added a mischievous fellow on
the opposite side, with a wink to the crowd.
Yes, a patent cigar-lighter, continued the first.
Man alive! exclaimed Boss,well, well,
what wont them Yankees make next? he added,
turning it in his fingers.
They're capital things, Boss; try one.
How do you fix 'emhow do they do?
Why, you see that little string there at the
end.
Yes.
Well, just light the tip end of that in the candle,
and then hold it to the end of your cigar, till you see
it begin to fiz a little, and it will light your cigar as
quick as a flash. First rate, I tell you.
Man alive! why, what a thing!
Boss did as he was directedhe held it patiently
to the end of his cigar, upon which he occasionally
gave a draw, as he noticed the flashes of the match.
He stood statue-like and still during the interesting
processthe company sat in mute expectation.
Suddenly
there was a loud explosionthe cigar, save
the stump, which he still convulsively held in his
teeth, was shattered to atoms, and his mouth, eyes,
and nose, filled with smoke and tobacco. The cigar
had been charged, and the powder had singed and
blinded him. He sprang into the middle of the floor
at a bound, where for a minute he stood utterly
bewildered
,
rubbing his distended eyes, and spitting
and gasping from the effects of the explosion.
Man alive! gasped he, at length. What
upon yeath was that?why, it went just like a blaze
of fire rite in my face. It like to tuck the wind out
o' me.
Boss did not observe the laugh which this strange
phenomenon had excited.
It must have been a bad cigar, suggested one.
Try another, Boss, said a second.
No, I thank you, squire, I don't keer to smoke
no more to-night, replied Boss, still endeavouring
to rectify his disturbed countenance, and all the
while wearing that wild look, so peculiar to
himself
.
He began to entertain some vague suspicions that
a trick had been played off upon him, and spoke of
retiring; another horn, however, disabused his mind,
or rather so totally fermented what little brains he
possessed, as to render him incapable of arranging
his thoughts on that or any other subject. One
suggested
the idea that perhaps the persons who had
robbed him, having overheard his disclosures, were
desirous of taking his life, and had fired in upon
him as he was lighting his cigar. Some men, when
they are drunk, are apt to imagine themselves beset
by thieves, assassins, and all manner of evil doers.
Boss was of this sort, and the latter suggestion took
at once.
Yes, said he, that 'counts for itsome
infernal
pirate is dodgin' about arter my life now, but he
dasent show his face. Let any man, what wants
any thing out o' Boss Ankles, just make his
'pearance
'fore his face.
Then stepping to the door, with a mouthful of
oaths, he called out
Come on with your Booyer-knives and your
double-barrelled pistols, you thieves-o'-thunder, and
if I don't whoop the valley of the truck you tuck
from me out o' ye, then I aint Boss Ankles.
Go it, Boss, I'll stand to your back.
I don't ax no odds of nobody, shouted Boss,
smacking his fists together, and leaping about the
floor like a cat.
Boss aint afraid of sky-rockets.
Dn your sky-rackets, said Boss, who's
them?
Look out they don't put 'em to you, Boss
they're sudden death, if they get hold of you
once.
Who is they, gentle
men?
whar is they?
There! there! look out!
Pop, pop, pop, went a whole pack of
cigar-lighters
about Boss's ears. With a loud yell of
terror he tore away from his friends and dashed into
the street, shouting for life, while the poppers at his
back shone brilliantly in the darkness, as they kept
up a sort of irregular
feu-de-joy
until they were all
exploded. By this time he had half the
village-boys
at his heels, whooping and screaming like a
pack of hounds in full cry. As the last squib
exploded
,
Boss stopped in his headlong flight, almost
out of breath from fright and fatigue, for he had
flown on the wings of terror at what he supposed to
be an application of the fatal sky-rackets. When
the crowd came up, two or three gathered round
with expressions of sympathy and friendship, and
ordered the rest to keep at a distance; declaring
they would chastise the first man that attempted to
harm their friend, Mr. Boss Ankles. Boss was
completely
5
bewilderedhis belligerent spirit had fled,
and he stood in amazement and fear.
Who is I done any harm to?what is I done to
be mislisted in sich a way, gentle
men?
I haint no
grudge agin nobody.
The response was a shout.
Stand your ground, Boss, said his friends,
we'll see you out.
Boss plucked up courage.
Now you try that agin, if you like it, cus yer
picters. The first man that touches me, I'll whip,
'cept I die tryin'. I gives you all warnin', and if
you
But another rattling report assailed his ears, and
again he was flying down the street, like a comet
with a fiery tail, shouting in accents of terror, which
were drowned by the clamours of the pursuing crowd.
Coming to a halt as before, his zealous friends
again joined him.
Now, who was that? demanded one, as soon
as they reached himCome here, Mr. Ankles,
and the first man that attempts to harm you
Gentle
men
, interrupted Boss, them infernal
sky-rackets will be the death o' mewon't nobody
keep 'em off me. Do, gentle
men
, keep 'em off this
time, for heaven's sake.
Stand off, you scoundrelsthe first man that
comes near Mr. Ankles
Pop, fiz, pop, pop, and away darted Mr. Ankles
like a quarter-horse.
The same scene was repeated ten or a dozen
times, and, at each discharge of the poppers, Ankles
took to his heels and continued at the top of his
speed until the entire pack was exploded. Twelve
o'clock found him still running the gauntlet,
bare-headed
and bare-footed, and quite exhausted from
fatigue, notwithstanding the potent draughts of rum
which he was from time to time prevailed upon to
take.
The sport was about drawing to a close. The
last pack had been exploded, when Boss brought
himself to a halt, and announced his intention to die
in his tracks. The crowd, as usual, pressed round
him; those most conspicuous as his friends placing
themselves at his side, declaring their willingness to
sacrifice themselves in his defence; when,
suddenly
,
there was a tremendous explosion in their midst!
For an instant a livid flame illuminated the scene,
which the next moment was shrouded in darkness.
There was a moment's panica moment's
death-like
silence, followed by a loud cry of wonder from
the flying mob. Then there was some coughing
and hard breathing to be heard, and many
extravagant
expressions of surprise. Some had been
knocked down and blindedthese were gathering
themselves up and making off as fast as possible.
Some three or four of the ring-leaders had been
more or less burned, and were loud in demanding
Who done that? But amid all the confusion that
ensued, poor Boss, who lay upon the ground near
where he had been standing, was distinctly heard,
shouting Murder! murder! with the earnestness
of a dying man. His clothes had been nearly all
blown off him, and the few shreds of his coat
which still hung to his shoulders were on fire.
They were soon extinguished, however, by such as
were not busied in brushing the crisped hair from
about their own faces, or feeling for their eye-brows
and winkers in the dark; and those who had so
recently been cruelly engaged in making him the
subject of their mirth, now did every thing in their
power to promote his comfort.
The mystery was soon explained. Boss had,
during
the day, purchased a quantity of gun-powder,
which he had deposited in his coat pocket. This
having been ignited by the squibs, had occasioned
the extraordinary blow up. Luckily, no serious
damage had been donebut Boss was quite sure
that
his
time had come.
You see now, gentle
men
, said he in a gasping
tone, what you's done with yer dratted sky-rackets.
You's fixed me off and made a widder of my wife
and children. I's a dead man! You see what you
all's done, and I s'pose you's satisfied.
By this time 'squire Rogers, near whose residence
the explosion took place, made his appearance, and
after rebuking the boys, and telling them how wrong
it was to use any poor critter that-a-way, and
reminding them that they didn't know what they
mought come to yet afore they died, took the poor
fellow in charge and kept him till morning.
On the following day, Boss was enabled to see
into the whole matter. He was in a sorry plight,
indeed, but a subscription being made up for him,
he was fully indemnified for all losses sustained, and
departed in a good humour, considering the
circumstances
;
not, however, before making a solemn
asseveration over a sample of Mr. Harley's best, that
he would never take another snooze under the
Pineville
China trees, or permit himself again to be
blowed up with a sky-racket.
5*
THE MYSTERY REVEALED;
OR THE WAY ALL HANDS WERE MOST OUDACIOUSLY TUCK IN.
Pineville
awoke from the quiet slumber of a
starless night. The morning was cloudy and damp,
and long after the most fashionable citizens had
broken their fast, a dense fog still rested upon the
earth, involving houses and horseblocks, shops and
shantees, sign-posts and horse-racks, flower-gardens
and duck-ponds, chimneys and fodder-stacks, objects
conspicuous and objects out of sight, things elegant
and things inelegant, (which in our villages are usually
disposed in such pleasing contrast,) in one general,
indiscriminate obscurity. But the glorious orb at
length appeared, dispelling the mists and vapors of
the upper air, and sending its genial rays aslant upon
the scene, imparting life and animation to the
Pinevillians
,
and brilliancy and beauty to the landscape.
Then it was that signs of animal life and
enjoyment
might have been detected by the discriminating
observer. Men and cattle were astirthe former in
pursuit of the various occupations by which they
obtained
a livelihood, and the latter migrating to the
woods and fields for the same laudable purpose.
The village swine were performing scavenger duty
in the streets and yardsthe matronly old hens were
leading forth their young fledglings to the morning
repast, scratching up the isolated grubs and
disturbing
the repose of the indolent bugs that lay concealed
among the weeds and rubbish,while a gang of
vagabond goats were performing feats of agility about
the court-house steps. But by far the most
interesting
group was that which had assembled round the
piazza of the village hotel, to pick their teeth in
company
,
whittle the backs of the split-bottomed chairs,
and discuss the topics of the day. There was a
dearth of news just at that time, and conversation
was dull. Something was said about the probable
price of cotton in the fall, and some grave
speculations
were made as to the prospects of the corn crop.
Old Mr. Hearty, who is generally regarded as an
oracle in such matters, expressed his deliberate
conviction
that the price of cotton would mainly depend
upon the quality of the staple, what the planter
ax'd for it, and what the buyer was willing to
givethere was no doubt in his mind about that, it
was a settled matterbut as to the corn crop, that
depended entirely on circumstances. One ventured
the opinion that the rain was over. Sammy
Stonestreet
whom
the boys universally called Stone
fence
,
because of his unconscionable uglinesssaid he knew
a yarb for taking pimples off people's faces, to
which Tom Rogers, who was slightly affected that
way, replied, that it was a pity he could not find
something that would soak the ugly out of his own
countenance, which, he said, was enough to give
him the night-mare every night of his life. The
latter
remark raised a laugh at Sammy's expense, and,
after a pause, Billy Wilder asked if anybody had
any good tobacco; upon which Bob Echols pulled
out a piece about the size of his handbut in reality
only half a
hand
of tobaccoand passed it to Billy,
after which it passed through divers other hands
until the greater part found its way into the mouths
of the bystanders, and not even the slightest moiety
would ever have reached its owner again, had not
some one on the outskirts of the crowdwho
probably
had a hole in his pocketcalled out Who's
tobacco's this? Bob owned the remnant, remarking
that he
bought
it at Harley's, and conversation
and expectoration became brisk and general.
Some writers would pause here, to give the reader
a group of portraitsin other words, to give him a
separate and special introduction to the crowd into
whose midst we have thus unceremoniously ushered
him. But we will not imitate their example, for
good and sufficient reasonsfirst, because we do not
claim to be skilled in the limning art, and, secondly,
because we consider an unsuccessful portrait no
better
than a caricaturea libel on the originaland
thirdly, and lastly, as the logicians say, because we
prefer (and we doubt not but our readers do the
same) to form our estimates of individuals from an
acquaintance with their characters, rather than by
the contour of their featuresindeed we find this the
only safe way to judge of people.
But as Sammy Stonestreet appears to have been
designed and blocked out by nature herself for a
caricature upon his species, we may venture to make
a dab at his profile, with no very serious
apprehensions
of spoiling the job; and after informing the
reader that the balance of the company was
composed
of just such a variety as he would be likely to
meet assembled at that hour of the day round the
door of a village boarding-house, we will leave him
to cultivate his acquaintance with them as we
progress
with our sketch.
Well, then, when we said Sammy was
unconscionably
ugly, we spoke conscientiously. His
order of ugliness was perfectly
sui generis
Boss
Ankles, not even the genius of ugliness himself (if
there ever was such a deity) could claim kin with
Sammy Stonestreet on the score of family
resemblance
,
so peculiar to himself was the style and
fashion of his deformity. But for fear the reader
should doubt our sincerity in this general allusion to
Sammy's personal appearance, we will endeavour to
give him some vague idea, at least, of that
individual's
peculiar form and favour. To begin, then,
Samuel Stonestreet stood, nett (he wore no shoes)
five feet one, and a fraction; but he claimed full
another
inch, in consideration of the angle of his legs,
for he was desperately knock-kneed, with a drooping
forward inclination of these latteral appendages,
which caused him to stand rather in a jumping
attitude
,
upon the palms of his feet. To proceed
upwards
,
he was remarkably short in the cupple, as a
wagoner would say, which was probably owing to a
most unnatural and unhealthy hump, which seemed
originally to have been lodged upon the right
shoulder
,
but which had swayed back and downwards
until it had given a sort of sidewise twist to his body,
which, as he approached you, swinging his
cotton-stalk
in his hand, his little gray, sinister eyes
twinkling
in his head, gave him very much the appearance
of one about to deal a blow, and many an unlucky
lick had poor Sammy received from
over-squeamish
persons, in consequence of the natural belligerance
of his attitude. But to proceed to the climax of
mortal
ugliness. A short shrivelled neck supported a
head of ponderous dimensionsa perfect chaos of
phrenological developmentsa mental Alps, with
promontories and peaks, ravines and valleys, utterly
defying any thing like scientific exploration or
systematic
measurement. But what shall we say of his
face? Broad, round, and quince-colouredbut we
will, perhaps, succeed better to take a feature at a
timesmall nose, decidedly snub, with pink-coloured
nostrilseyes, pale, gray, and small, divided by the
slightest particle of nose, which seemed stretched
upwards solely for that purposelips thin and
colourless
,
the upper one short and inclined towards the
nose, leaving exposed the teeth of the upper jaw,
which projected far over his nether grinders;mouth
large and difficult to close, while the chin, which
should have terminated the lower region of the facial
territory, seemed to have shrunk entirely away,
leaving
the neck and mouth in close proximity. But, as
if nature's finishing touch had been designed solely
to give full relief to this specimen of her handiwork,
she blessed Samuel with a profusion of bright
saffron-coloured
hair, for the better display of which she
added a cow-lick which held it erect from ear to
ear, giving a general contour of face more resembling
a weatherbeaten sun-flower, with a few seeds plucked
here and there for eyes, nose, and mouth, than any
thing else in nature to which we can liken it. But
enough of Sammy's hideousness.
The crowd were engaged, as when we left them,
in a sort of running, general conversation, when an
incident occurredfor it must be admitted that the
passage of a four-wheeled vehicle through a quiet
country-village like Pineville,
is
an incident. But
the occurrence to which we now more particularly
allude, was an incident indeed, one that will not be
forgotten while the chronicles of Pineville are
remembered
.
A large dapple-gray horse, evidently much
jaded, was seen approaching in a forced trot,
drawing
a rather dilapidated looking buggy, with two
women, in homespun frocks and green veils.
Conversation
was suddenly suspended, while every eye
was directed to the vehicle. It came down the street
towards the tavern, but it did not stop. The horse
seemed willing, even desirous, as he drew near the
sing-post, but one of the women,not the one who
held the lines,extended a brawny hand, in which
she held a stout hickory, and dealt him a blow that
tallied its date upon every rib of the side upon which
it fell. The poor animal frisked his tail and
quickened
his gait, but endeavoured to turn the next
corner
on the opposite side, which effort was, however,
promptly counteracted by repeated applications of
the aforesaid hickory. Having finally gained the
main road, the horse was forced into a rapid gait,
in which he continued until lost to the view of the
astonished spectators.
Not a word was spoken for full a minute after the
passage of the vehicle; but any one who had
observed
the severe scrutiny with which the crowd
regarded those veiled women, and noticed the
glancing
of eyes and peculiar suspicious expression of their
countenances, would have been qualified that but one
sentiment prevailed in that company, and that was,
that all was not right in that buggy.
Sammy Stonestreet was the first to break silence.
Dadfetcht, said he, if I don't bet my best
dominecker, (Sam
fit
chickens occasionally,) that
them's men in wimin's clothes.
Pshaw! what a idee! ejaculated old Mr. Hearty,
resuming the seat from which he had risen to get a
better look.
Well, they's monstrous quare lookin'
wimminflesh
,
that's a fact, remarked Billy Wilder, with an
air of curious gravity; I never seed a woman hit a
hoss sich a lick as that afore in my life.
And how fast they druv, observed one.
I'd gin a pretty penny to got a squint at ther
faces, said another, but them dratted veils hid
'em clean.
I seed 'em! I seed 'em! exclaimed Sammy,
bustling about in the crowd, and if that one on this
side didn't have whiskers, I hope I may never see
chinkapin time agin, dadfetch me!
But, boys, did you ever see a woman as tall as
that one that toated the hickory? inquired one.
Well, they didn't look much like any of our
gals about ther waists, that's a fact, remarked
uncle Hearty, beginning to give in to the popular
opinion. Take it altogether, it
is
rather a
suspicious
circumstance.
Gentle
men
, remarked Dr. Peter Jones, that
horse has come more than twenty miles this morning,
or more likely has travelled all nighta very strong
symptom that something's in the wind.'
Shore enough, said Bob Echols, and to pass
right through town so, without stopping for breakfast
nor nothing. I tell you what now, all aint right.
Well, who is they? whar upon yeath can they
be gwine in sich a hurryment?
Ther aint no tellin', answered Billy Wilder,
in these times quare things is turnin' up every day.
They mought be some fellers broke from the
penitentiary
,
or it mought be the sub-treasury runnin' away
with the government money.
That's a fact, and it ought to be seen into,
remarked
half a dozen in the crowd.
Just at this crisis, old 'squire Rogers, in company
with Mr. Montgomery, the schoolmaster, approached
from the post-office, from which they had just received
their newspapers. The 'squire unfolded the
Columbus
Enquirer, and placed his spectacles astride
of his nose, while the crowd were relating to him the
circumstance of the mysterious buggy, and indulging
in their various speculations respecting the probable
character of its inmates. After glancing his eyes for
a moment over the damp sheet, while some half
dozen pressed round and gazed over his shoulder,
the old gentleman read aloud
DARING AND EXTENSIVE ROBBERY!
TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS REWARD!!
6
The sensation produced in the crowd by this
startling
announcement was tremendous.
Ah! eh! what?Robbers? where? when?
Didn't I say so? Read it out!Let's catch 'em!
came from a dozen throats at once, while Sammy
went leaping, like a kangaroo with a split stick on
his tail, from side to side, exclaiming
Didn't I know, Billy?didn't I say so, uncle
Hearty? Dadfetch me if I's the chap to be fooled
with petticoats. Didn't I see boots and trowser's
legs under them gowns?
It was several minutes before any one could be
heard above the general clamour of the crowd, which
had now considerably increased in number. At
length, when order had been in some measure
restored
,
at the request of 'squire Rogers, Mr.
Montgomery
read the article from the paper, which stated
that the Insurance and Trust Company's Bank at
Columbus had been broken into a few nights
previous
by two armed men, and robbed of upwards of
$80,000 in specie and bills, and that a reward of
$10,000 had been offered for the apprehension of the
robbers. Before the last word was fairly out of the
reader's mouth, a confusion of voices shouted
Them's they!Let's catch 'em!No time's
to be lost! and two or three were seen running for
the sheriff without further consultation.
In less than five minutes, all Pineville was in
commotion
.
It was now settled in the minds of the
majority
,
beyond the question of a doubt, that a brace of
daring bank-robbers had just passed through town
disguised as women, and there was not wanting those
who were willing to affirm that they not only saw
whiskers beneath those veils, but that pistols and
bowie-knives protruded from the bosoms of their
gowns; and Sammy Stonestreet was dadfetcht if
he didn't hear dollars jingle in the bottom of the
buggy, when the wheel struck a certain root. There
were some obstinate people, who always would have
opinions of their own, that could see no reason for
entertaining any such suspicion; but these were few,
and nobody cared whether they could or not. Half
the men in town were going in pursuitall the
horses, old saddles and remnants of bridles were put
in requisition, and there had not been such a
mustering
of old shot-guns and horse-pistols since the
Indian war.
Why, what upon yeath's broke loose now?
inquired
Major Joseph Jones, as he rode into the midst
of the crowd of armed and mounted men, having just
arrived from his plantation.
Come on, Major, said the sheriff; you're the
very man we want.
But whar you all gwine, boyswhat's to pay?
Oh, a heap! robbers! ten thousand dollars
reward
escaped
in wimin's clothes! with green veils!
not more'n fifteen minutes ago! was all the major
could gather from the confusion of voices around
him. But he was a public-spirited man, and was
determined to have a hand in the game, whatever it
was.
Come on! shouted the sheriff, and away dashed
the whole cavalcade, down the road, rolling back a
thick cloud of dust from their horses' feet, and raising
a din and clamour that nearly frightened the women
and children out of their senses. Another moment,
and they were lost to the sight of those whom they
had left to indulge in speculations, doubts, and
surmises
,
until their return.
Like a tempest they swept through the country,
carrying terror before them, and leaving astonishment
and wonder in their trainchildren ran screaming to
their mothers, women shrunk from the doors and
windows, dogs barked, and cows ran bellowing to
the woods. Onward and onward they spedalready
several miles had been gained, and eager eyes were
looking up the long stretches of the road in the
confident
hope of soon overtaking the object of their
pursuit. At length the party arrived at a fork of the
roadtracks of wheels were discovered in both. A
brief consultation was held, when it was determined
that the sheriff with one part of the company should
take the road to the right, and the major with the
balance should pursue that leading to the left. Not
a moment was to be lost.
The party are already divided, and each division
pursuing its respective route at the top of their speed.
We will go with the sheriff.
Continuing the same rapid gait, the sheriff's party
proceeded about two miles, when, meeting a
horseman
with whom they were all well acquainted, they
asked if he had met a buggy with two women in
green veils.
Yes, said Mr. Hopkins, I met old Mrs. Curloo
and her daughter Nancy, in a buggy just back here
a piece, gwine down to Billy Curloo's, on the Runs.
Are you certain it was Mrs. Curloo?
To be sure I is, for I stopped and chatted with
'em a minit; but they was in a monstrous hurry, as
they said Billy was gwine to make a die of it and
had sent for 'em.
This was perfectly satisfactory, and the sheriff and
his party, chop-fallen and mortified in the extreme,
turned back to town, with only one consolatory
reflection
wherewith to relieve their deep chagrin,
which was, that the other party were likely to be
worse fooled than themselves.
Now, this has all come of listening to that
abominable
fool, Stonestreet, remarked the sheriff, as
they rode leisurely along on their return. I had no
confidence in his story in the first place; but
everybody
seemed to agree with him, and, under the
circumstances
,
the least I could do was to investigate
the matter.
I was a-most certain it was all a piece of
nonsense
in the first place, remarked a rather elderly
member of the party, who had but a few minutes
before been the boldest and most determined in the
pursuit; but nothing would satisfy 'em but I must
come. I wouldn't a gin the old mare sich a brush,
not for the whole Curloo generation.
'Taint that what
I
looks at, said John Hicks
it's the everlastin' laugh the fellers will have on us.
We wont hear the eend of this bis'ness for a coon's
age, you see if we do.
That we wont, said the sheriff; and he laid
back in his saddle and took a good hearty laugh at
himself. Two women in green veils ride through
6*
our town in haste to see a sick relation, and in fifteen
minutes half the inhabitants are in pursuit of them,
with guns, pistols, and jack-knives, to take them for
bank robbers. Was there ever such a pack of fools?
At the end of this speech of the sheriff's, he took
another laugh, and the whole party made an attempt
to raise a general laugh, but it was a shallow affair
and soon died away. There seemed to be a
conviction
resting upon their minds that the laugh was on
the other sidethat they were much better qualified
just then to be laughed at than to laugh. Each
seemed desirous of relieving himself of as much of
the ridicule as possible. One mentioned the fact that
he
had brought no gun, and another only went along
to see the fun; and, finally, they all came to the
conclusion
that they were not half so deeply involved as
the party that were still in pursuit.
Their jaded horses did not travel back so briskly,
and it was past noon when they reached the village.
Some two or three made it convenient to find
business
in the country, leaving the sheriff and the balance
of their companions in the chase to bear the brunt of
the ridicule which was sure to be heaped upon them
by those who, for want of horses, had been compelled
to remain at home. As the party rode up to the
tavern, a crowd of eager inquirers were soon
assembled
round them, from whom questions came thick
and loud.
Did you cotch 'em?Who was they?
Whar's the rest o' the boys? and a hundred other
such interrogatories were put, before the sheriff, who
had begun the laugh in advance, had time to state the
facts. As soon, however, as he was allowed a
hearing
,
he made a faithful report of the proceedings,
informing
them of all that had transpired.
A loud shout ensued, in which the sheriff and his
party joined with as good grace as the circumstances
would permit. After the noise had somewhat
subsided
,
the shrill, squeaking voice of Sammy
Stonestreet
was heard in the midst of the crowd.
You needn't tell me! he exclaimed; oh, no,
you needn't tell me, 'squire! Them wasn't no
Curloos
,
them wasn't. I knows the Curloos like a
book, and I'll be dadfetcht if ther was a sign of a
Curloo in that buggy what went through here this
morning.
Did you see the buggy yourself, 'squire? asked
one.
Oh, no, but it was just on ahead, and Hopkins
told us all we wanted to know.
What Hopkins, Henry or Peter? inquired
another
.
Peter Hopkins, who used to oversee for old man
Stullings, you know.
Oh, yes, shouted two or three, he's the
Hopkins
that came so nigh gwine to the penitentiary for
stealin' niggers; and the universal opinion was, that
he was not worthy of belief, and that just as likely
as not he had been sent back by the robbers to put
the sheriff off their track.
I know'd itit's jest as I 'spected, said
Sammy
.
Them devils is got clean off after all. Pete
Hopkins aint no better nor he should be, and I
wouldn't swar he wasn't in cahoot with 'em!
Some further inquiry was made about Hopkins.
His character sank a degree at every probe, until it
was far below the moral zero, and when it was
understood
that he had disappeared shortly after his
interview with the sheriff, the suspicion that he was
leagued with the robbers was entertained by all those
who still hoped that the very worst surmises of the
morning, respecting the inmates of the buggy, might
prove true; which, as is usually the case, on such
occasions, comprised much the largest portion of the
company.
The sheriff, fully satisfied in his own mind as to
the character of the strangers, soon after retired,
leaving
the crowd to indulge their various speculations.
Uncle Hearty winked his eye significantly, and
remarked
that it was a very quare way to do
business
,
to ride ten miles after robbers, and git rite up
to 'em, and then come away without so much as ever
settin' eyes on 'em.
Did you
ever!
said a bystanderand then for
to go and take Pete Hopkins's word all about it!
I didn't like the perceedin', myself, remarked
the elderly gentleman before alluded to, as one of
the sheriff's party; but
he
was the sheriff, you
know.
Sheriff or no sheriff, you wouldn't choked this
child off that a-way, said one with a resolute twist
of the headI'd seed whether they was Curloos
or not, I'll be bound.
Gentle
men
, said Sammy Stonestreet, them
was no more Curloos than I is. Why, Lord bless
you, Nancy Curloo aint more'n so big, (measuring
with his hand from the ground,) and don't know a
green veil from a bed-quilt.
And I'd like to know, remarked a very
calculating
little man, what they would come away round
through town for, to go to the Runs, when they could
just cut across by Parker's Bridge, and save more
than five miles of the distance.
That's a fact, chimed in a dozen who were
familiar with the road.
Indeed, so settled had become the opinion, among
the crowd of gossips who thronged about the tavern,
that the sheriff had been misled, that there was some
talk of getting up another party to go in pursuit of
the robbers. But it was getting late, and the few
horses left in town were unfit for service, after the
fatigue of the morning. Besides, it was confidently
expected that the party then in pursuit would come
upon the track which had been so stupidly abandoned
by the sheriff; in which event their capture was
inevitable
.
Sammy expressed the most unbounded
confidence in Major Jones, giving it as his opinion
that if the major once got on their trail, he would
follow them to Florida before he would allow them
to escape.
But the winds themselves are not more changeable
than public opinion; and as well might one attempt
to hold the unseen currents of the air in check, as to
stay the tide of public sentiment, when once the
elements
of reaction are at work. There are always
some one or two persons in every small community,
who lead the mass, and, as when some avant-swine
breaks through the barrier that circumscribes the
wanderings of the herd, the balance are sure to rush
impetuously through the same hole, so the multitude
are certain to give unanimous assent to the opinions
of those whose lead they are accustomed to follow.
Among the acknowledged sense-keepers of
Pineville
,
Mr. Montgomery, the schoolmaster, stood
A. No. 1, and it was just the easiest thing in the
world for him to blow all Sammy Stonestreet's
cherished
notions to Ballyhack. The old gentleman
was utterly astonished at the credulity of his
fellow-citizens
,
and was surprised beyond measure that
anybody should entertain for a moment the very
ridiculous
suspicions that had been indulged that
morning
.
The town was coming to a pretty pass, indeed,
that two poor women could not drive through to see
a sick relation without being pursued as bank-robbers.
He had no opinion of the proceedings in the first
place, but since the sheriff had returned, he thought
that every one ought to be satisfied as to the
character
of the strangers. 'Squire Rogers was decidedly
of his opinion, and Mr. Peter Hopkins, who had been
detained by business on the road, having arrived in
town and reiterated and confirmed the statement of
the sheriff, the almost unanimous opinion was that the
whole matter was a piece of perfect tom foolery,
and that the party that had gone in pursuit, and
especially those that were still absent on that business,
ought to be ashamed of themselves.
Only one solitary individual had the hardihood still
to proclaim his conviction that the strangers were not
what they represented themselves to be, and that
obdurate
individual was Sammy Stonestreet.
Never mind, said he, you'll seemaybe I
is
a fool, and Mr. Montgomery knows every thingbut
I'll be dadfetcht if I don't know what I does know,
jest as well as anybodyand I know I seed
whiskers
and trowsers, and I know I can tell Nancy
Curloo
and her mother from two dratted grate big strappin'
men, if they is got gowns and green veils on. But
you'll seejest wait till Major Joe comes, will you?
And, sure enough, they did wait for Major Joe and
his party, but not with the same anxious hopes that
filled the bosom of the inveterate Sammy. They
waited
the arrival of their absent friends, in order that they
might heap upon them the overwhelming measure of
their ridicule, by the bestowal of which they hoped
to mitigate, in some measure, the deep chagrin which
they felt for the part themselves had taken in the
ridiculous affair.
The hours rolled off. It was sunset, and yet the
Curloo chasers, as they termed them, had not arrived.
The crowd still lingered about the hotel, eager to
greet them, and many was the funny remark and
witty joke enjoyed at the expense of the absent.
But all this was nothing to what was in store for them
on their arrival.
Never mindyou'll see! was all that Sammy
could say.
Yes, you
will
see, said one; you'll see one
of the sneakinest lookin' gangs of fellers that ever
was in Pineville. The fact is, I b'lieve they're
ashamed to come home.
I shouldn't wonder if they was, chimed in uncle
Hearty.
I'll bet Major Jones don't show his face in town
for a month, remarked one of the crowd. But as
for Dr. Pete, it aint the first time he's been tuck in,
tryin' to get people to git the reward.
He
oughtn't
to mind it a snuff.
That's a fact, the doctor's been monstrous
unlucky, said another; he got his mouth badly
mashed that time when he tuck the major, and I
wouldn't be surprised if he was to git his dratted
neck broke some of these days with some of his
smartness.
It was now quite dusk, and still no signs of the
party; various surmises and conjectures were
advanced
as to the probable cause of the delay. Some
thought they had gone so far, in their headlong haste,
that they had not yet been able to retrace their steps
others were apprehensive that their horses had
given out, while much the larger portion were of
opinion that they were really ashamed to come home
in daylight.
Never you mind, said Sammy, as he stood with
his gaze intently directed down the road.
The crowd were growing more and more
impatient
,
and the prospect of being compelled to forego
the fun they had anticipated in quizzing and
ridiculing
the Curloo chasers, began to operate as a check
upon the hilarity of the hour, when, suddenly,
Sammy
was heard to exclaim
Look! see!ah! eh?yes, yanderdadfetcht,
yander they ishurra, boys!now we'll see! and
away he ran, followed by the whole company, in
the direction of the road, in which a group of
mounted men were dimly seen, slowly approaching
the town.
In another minute Sammy was dancing about in
a perfect ecstasy, shouting as he flourished his
cotton-stalk
over his head,I told you so!here
they is!them's they!them's the Curloos! Hurra
for Major Jones!I know'd he'd cotch 'em. Maybe
I is a foolmaybe I don't know a man with a frock
on from a Curloo!
And sure enough, to the utter astonishment of
everybody except Sammy Stonestreet, there they
weretwo individuals in women's clothes, with
veils. It was too dark to observe the precise colour
of the veils, but as the two who wore them were led
along in the midst of the horsemen, burdened with
ropes and cords about their necks and arms, the
crowd were at once satisfied of their identity, and
with one voice, or rather in a confusion of voices,
pressed their inquiries as to the whereabouts and
manner of their capture. But it would have taken
more tongues than were in that little party to answer
half the interrogatories of the fast collecting citizens,
and they hurried on to the magistrate's office, where
it was understood all would be revealed.
All Pineville was in an uproar. They've caught
'em! was the universal cry of old and young, as
they hastened to join the crowd that had assembled
around 'Squire Rogers's office, which was now
promptly lighted up and put in readiness for the
customary magisterial investigation. Sammy
Stonestreet
was in his glory, and could not refrain from
raising the skirt of one of the prisoner's frocks with
7
his stick, that he might exhibit the boots and
trowsers which he had testified to in the
morning
.
Didn't I say so! he would exclaim,
maybe I
is
a fool and can't tell trowsers when I
see 'em.
At length, every thing being in readiness, 'Squire
Rogers having taken his seat at his desk, adjusted
his spectacles upon his nose, and placed the Bible
and the Georgia Justice in fearful array before him,
the prisoners were summoned into the presence of
that worthy functionary of the law. As they were
ushered into the lighted room, they were observed
to hold down their heads and gather their veils
closer round their faces. All eyes were directed
upon them, and 'Squire Rogers regarded them for a
moment through his spectacles with legal severity.
A pretty pair of birds, really, said his honour,
to be circumlocutin' about the country in this
waythen he whispered a few words in Mr.
Montgomery's
ear and resumedbut we'll try to take
care of you for the futer;but the noise was so great
that he could not proceed, and he commanded,
Silence
in court! I s'pose, resumed the 'squire,
you thought we was all asleep, down here in
Pineville
,
and you would just ride through our town
with perfect infinity, dressed out in them wimin's
toggeries.
Here the sheriff inquired what had been done with
the buggy, to which Major Jones replied, that it was
coming on in charge of Dr. Peter Jones and Bob
Echolsthe horse was completely broken down, and
they were obliged to travel very slow.
This explanation was perfectly satisfactory, and
the 'squire proceeded. Taking up his pen he wrote
in large round characters,
State of Georgia
, then,
after referring to the Digest before him, he demanded
of the prisoners their names.
There was some hesitation on the part of the
prisoners
.
Come, resumed the 'squire, you mought as
well speak 'em out; I don't think sich characters as
you need be 'shamed of this respectable company.
Then looking steadfastly at them, with all the dignity
of his station, he again demanded in a stern voice,
What mought be your names?
Upon which they threw up their veils and
answered
Bob Echols and Peter Jones, at your service!
The 'squire, in his sudden amazement, dropped
the Georgia Justice on the floor, while Sammy
Stonestreet's
eyes, mouth, and nose, were transformed into
so many exclamation points, all expressive of his
utter astonishment and surprise.
Well, he exclaimed, giving vent to a volume
of suppressed breath with the wordif that aint a
nice come off, dadfetch me!
He would, perhaps, have said more on the
occasion
,
but his voice was drowned by the crowd, who
now joined in one concentrated shout that shook the
very roof, and waked the echoes in the remotest
quarters of the village.
In the midst of the confusion 'Squire Rogers rose
from his seat and placed his hat upon his head,
remarking
Well, boys, it's my opinion all hands has been
most oudaciously tuck in this time!
The matter is soon explained to the reader. The
young men who composed the major's party had
learned the result of the sheriff's investigations, from
an individual who had been in town during the day,
and foreseeing the ridicule that was certain to be
visited upon them by their fellow-citizens, had
recourse
to the trick which they so successfully
practised
,
in order to involve their neighbours in the same
dilemma with themselves. The dresses were readily
obtained from some of their country acquaintances,
and they waited until night, that under its shadows
they might the better avoid detection.
ADVENTURE OF A SABBATH-BREAKER.
Mr. Eugenius Augustus Van Scoik
was born
somewhere down east, but for the purposes of
the sketch which we are about to give of a single
incident in his lifean incident the more important
for the influence it exerted upon his subsequent
career
it
is not material that we should state precisely
where or when. Suffice it, he had been trained up
in the way he should go, and had been sent forth
into the world to seek his fortune, with the fervent
admonitions of a pious mother, who concluded her
long dissertation upon matters and things in general,
with the solemn injunctionBut, Eugenius
Augustus
,
dear, whatever you do, be a good boy and
go to meeting every Sunday,to which he replied
that he would be certain to do so.
Mr. Van Scoik's talents had been devoted to
mercantile pursuitsnot on his own account, it is
true, but on account of his health, which had been
delicate from his youthand he now gave himself
out as a professional salesman, in which capacity he
had made his appearance in Pineville with Mr.
Harley's latest importation of new goods from New
York. He was a tall, chalky-complexioned,
crane-built
,
gosling-looking youth, with a very prominent
beak, and eyes askew. The nose stuck right
7*
out, and there was no help for it, but he managed
to hide the slight obliquity in the setting of his
visual organs, by means of a pair of large-bowled
silver spectacles, with green glasses, which he wore
under pretext of weakness.
Mr. Eugenius Augustus Van Scoik was a polite,
good-natured, Miss-Nancy sort of a young
gentleman
,
and of course soon acquired great popularity
among the elderly ladies, to whom he always
warranted
his goods not to fade, tear, or wear out, and
was certain to throw in the thread and little things,
even if he had to thumb it a small amount in the
measurement of the yards to make up for his
generosity
.
The young ladies, too, thought Mr. Harley's
new store-keeper a dreadful nice young man,
if he didn't have such a horrid nose, and the
community
,
generally, who had heard his psalm-singing,
and noted his punctual attendance at church, every
Sunday morning, had marked him down as a very
proper young man, notwithstanding his nose; and
Parson Storrs had been heard to speak of him as an
example worthy of imitation by the young men of
Pineville.
But Mr. Van Scoik struggled against a besetting
temptation unknown to any but himself. If he had
an inveterate, unconquerable propensity for any
thing
in
the world, it was for shooting robins. He
delighted in a shot-gun that wouldn't kick much, and
a bird that would sit, and he never looked out upon
the sky, but his soul panted to be away in the fields
with bag and gun. He dreamed of shooting all night,
and he ruminated on the subject all the day. He
had not taken a hunt since he left homehe had
been so busy in the storeand he determined to
have one fair shake at the birds, even if he had
to go on Sunday. If the truth must be told, he had
grown so loose in his morals under the influence of
our vertical sun, that he began to entertain very
little reverence for those holy ordinances, which, in
his youth, he had been taught to obey, and he was
only deterred from the commission of what he would
once have regarded as an almost unpardonable sin,
by the fear of detection. There was now nothing
very shocking to him in the violation of the Sabbath
but he would not have had anybody to see him
on that day with a gun in his hands for any
consideration
.
He was not long, however, in devising
a plan by which he was enabled to indulge his
propensity
without incurring the risk of being discovered
by those whose good opinions he was so anxious to
retain.
Accordingly, one beautiful Sunday afternoon, Mr.
Eugenius Augustus Van Scoik sallied forth from his
boarding-house, and walked gravely along the main
street until he reached the edge of the woods, where
he was met by a little negro boy whom he had
engaged
to carry his gun, game-bag, &c., out of town.
Finding all right, he dismissed the boy, charging
him to be sure to meet him there at sun-down, to
take charge of his gun and game. It was the
beginning
of autumn, and the scene was lovely to
behold
the
leaves had not yet began to fall, but the
chill night-winds had delicately tinged the foliage
with every variety of hue, which were soon to
deepen into those bright colours which give such
variegated beauty to the southern landscape. As
we have said, it was a lovely eveningno cloud
obscured the sky, a gentle breeze played through
the branches of the trees, and the song of birds
mingled with the faint tones of the distant
church-bell
.
Even Mr. Eugenius Augustus Van Scoik
could not but feel the calm influence of such a
scene, and he felt ill at ease when he remembered
the fourth commandment,endorsed as it was by a
doting mother's parting admonition,and reflected
that he was in the very act of violating that sacred
mandate. But he endeavoured to silence the
chidings
of an awakened conscience, as he charged his
piece, and meditated death to all the wild fowl that
might chance to come within gun-shot of him
especially robins.
He had proceeded but a short distance when he
espied a mocking-bird perched upon the branch of
a tree, pouring forth its song in its wildest strain of
native melody. Stop! whispered Mr. Van Scoik
to himselfthere's a shot. Creeping up to a
convenient distance, he raised his gun and fired
away flew the bird, exceedingly terrified, but
unharmed
.
That's curious, said he to himself,
I had a first-rate aim. Having reloaded, he
looked around for an object at which to shoot. A
robin next attracted his attentionhis heart beat
double-quick, and his breath was suspended while
he crept cautiously uphe was about to pull the
trigger when away flew the robin!He clenched
his teeth hard together, but said nothing, as he
brought his gun down from his face. He saw the
bird light at a short distance, and hastened in
pursuit
.
His second attempt, however, proved as
unsuccessful
as the firsthe snapped two or three
times, and when his gun
did
go off, the robin went
off too. Darn
a
tion! petulantly exclaimed Mr.
Van Scoik, (putting the emphasis on
ation
,) as he
reloaded his gunthat's
tew
bad! Once more
he cast his eyes about in search of game, but his
firing had disturbed the Sabbath quiet of the place,
and the alarmed inhabitants had fled.
Mr. Eugenius Augustus directed his steps into
the open woods that lay before him. As he
approached
a small clump of chinkapin bushes, he
heard a slight rustling among the leaves. He
advanced
cautiously, peered into the thicket, walked
round to the other side, and looked closer. He was
about to abandon the search, when out flew a large
red-headed woodcock, and before he could raise
his gun to his face, the sancy bird was far away,
chuckling at a tremendous rate, as if in derision of
his pursuer. The circumstance was exceedingly
aggravating to our sportsman, and he resolved to
be more cautious in future.
He had proceeded but a short distance, when, in
another cluster of bushes, he heard something
moving
.
I'll not be bamboozled this time,
whispered
Mr. Van Scoik, as he brought up his gun and
advanced cautiously at present arms. He had
passed half round the thicket, and with his finger
on the trigger, was squatting low, that he might the
better see in, when suddenly a large bear sprang
from the bushes directly towards him! The gun
dropped from his handsthere was a loud scream
of terror, and the next moment Mr. Eugenius
Augustus
Van Scoik and the bear were testing their
speed in a foot-race through the woods. He had
never dreamed of starting such game so near town,
and the sudden surprise having seized upon his
legs, they bore him off at their utmost speed.
Brimfull
of horror, he remembered the fable in the
spelling-book
,
but he had no faith in acting 'possum
he cast one look behindhis grim pursuer was
close upon himthe next moment he had grasped
the trunk of a sapling and was climbing for dear
life.
He did not dare to look below until he had
ascended
some fifteen or twenty feet; he then
ventured
to reconnoitre his foe, when, to his utter
consternation, he beheld bruin hugging the trunk
of a larger tree, which, not till then, he discovered
grew close by the side of the one he was upon.
He watched the movements of the bear with
increasing
terror, and when he saw him rapidly
ascending
,
and observed his huge claws and frightful
tusks, he began to imagine himself torn to pieces
by the ferocious animal. Bruin had nearly reached
him, when he consulted his safety by moving higher
up. He had ascended until the sapling bent with
his weight, and he could go no higher. He looked
beneath, and the bear was fast approaching! What
was to be done? To descend was certain death
and to remain promised a no better fate. The bear
was soon opposite him, and with an awful grin, that
showed all his teeth at once, he extended his paw
towards Mr. Eugenius Augustus Van Scoik, who,
with a convulsive shudder, drew himself into the
smallest possible compass, and clung close to the
opposite side of the tree, by which means he barely
escaped the sharp claws of the animal. Rather than
undergo the agony of such close encounter with his
grim antagonist, Mr. Van Scoik resolved upon a
change of position, and relaxing his grasp,
descended
a few feet. Bruin soon placed himself directly
opposite, and again renewed his doubtful salutations.
Up went Mr. Van Scoik, and up went the bear.
We will not attempt to describe the looks exchanged
between them, nor the peculiar sensations of our
sportsman, under the circumstancesas the saying
is, they may be better imagined than described.
Thus the parties remained, with occasional slight
variations of attitude, for some time, until the bear,
probably becoming fatigued, gradually descended
to the ground. Hope revived within the bosom of
Mr. Eugenius Augustus Van Scoik. Now, thought
he, if he will only go away. But bruin was not to
be got rid of so easilyinstead of taking his
departure
,
he deliberately stretched himself at the root of
the sapling, as if resolved upon taking his prey by
siege.
It had now grown latethe sun was fast
declining
,
and Mr. Van Scoik had the melancholy
prospect
of a roost among the tree-tops for the night,
provided he survived so long. Alas, too late he
repented the sinful violation of the Sabbath, which
had led him into the awful dilemma in which he
found himself. Too late he wished that he had
obeyed the summons of the church-bell, and gone
to the house of worship, where, if he profited
nothing
,
he would at least have been out of harm's
way; and as he cast his eyes down, and
contemplated
the object of his terror, a superstitious dread
came over himlike that which ever haunts the
guiltythat the bear was but an instrument in the
hands of Providence, and had been specially
commissioned
to devour him, as the same animal had
once been sent to destroy the scoffers of Elijah.
Such and similar thoughts passed through his
almost frenzied brain, and he would have given all
the right, title, and interest he had, or ever expected
to have in this world, to have been released from
his dreadful situation.
As the shades of evening approached, despair
had nearly taken possession of his faculties, when,
for the first time during his perilous adventure, the
sound of a human voice broke upon his ear. He
listened, and his pulse throbbed with new life, as
he heard uttered in a low, monotonous strain, a
well-known negro chant
One moonlight night,
I walk'd along,
I hear dis music
Close behind,
Never pay much 'tention
Hello!help!help, here! shouted Mr. Van
Scoik with all his might.
Never pay much 'tention
Repeated the negro, not hearing the call for help,
as he went on with his ditty, keeping time with the
palms of his hands against his thighs
I looked around
And what should it be
But a big ole buckey hare?
A big ole buckey hare?
Yes, massa,
A big ole buckey hare!
I hitch'd 'em to my wagon,
And he wouldn't work dar
I hitch'd 'em to my cart,
And he wouldn't work dar
I hitch'd 'em to my plough,
Now didn't he rair?
Help! oh!you, mister; help, here! cried
Mr. Van Scoik, growing impatient, and beginning
to fear that the negro might pass without observing
him
Now
didn't
he rair?
With his spurers on,
And his shoe-boots on,
And his broad-cloth coat
Now didn't he shine?
Now didn't he shine?
Murder!help! oh, help here!
Who dat? asked the startled negro, for the
first time catching the sound of the voice from the
tree. Then stopping short in his path, he listened
for a moment in order to gain some further
intelligence
as to the nature of the alarm, before he
determined
whether to advance or retreat.
I say! you mister! come here and take my
gun, and shoot this bear!there's a live bear
here!
8
Ki, laughed the negro, 'spec dat's Jocko
what skeer dat white man.
As the negro approached, he soon saw into the
state of affairs, and not less to his own gratification
than that of Mr. Eugenius Augustus Van Scoik,
discovered his pet Jocko, of whom he was in
anxious search.
Why, massa, what for you got up da? Jocko
no bite nobody. Him got no harm in him no more'n
a little kitten. Come down, massa. Then
addressing
himself to the bear, he continued in a
rather different toneCome here, sa!what for
you been done gone all de mornin', ha?been
skeer de white man, tooyou 'bomination good for
nothing!never mind, ole feller, I git you home dis
time; you no git away any more, now mind dat!
While speaking, the negro fastened the rope
which he had brought for the purpose round the
bear's neek, and was about to lead him away; but
observing that the man in the tree did not come
down, he again called to him, assuring him that
there was no danger.
Come down, massa, Jocko aint gwine to bite
you. I bound he never bite nobody, massa.
By this time Mr. Van Scoik's fears had sufficiently
subsided to warrant him in descending. He had
nearly reached the ground when the bear sprang
towards him to the extent of his rope.
Wah-a-a-w!hold him! exclaimed Mr. Van
Scoik, again springing into the tree.
Yah, yah, yah, massa, Jocko only want to play
wid you.
But our sportsman's skepticism was not so easily
to be removed, nor would he again trust his legs to
the ground, until Jocko and his master were far
away on their road home. He then came down,
examined his torn clothes, searched about and
recovered
his gun, and, after making a solemn vow
never again to go a hunting on the Sabbath-day, set
out for home. And never since that day has Mr.
Eugenius Augustus Van Scoik been seen prowling
about the fields with a gun on his shoulder, on that
day which we are commanded to remember and
keep holy.
HOW TO KILL TWO BIRDS WITH ONE
STONE;
OR THE WAY THOMAS JEFFERSON JENKINS
GOT A START IN THE WORLD.
In
our country the Law
is
the high-road to
preferment
.
That there is no question about the truth
of this proposition in the minds of our promising
young men, we may infer from the fact that so
large a portion of them adopt the legal profession;
but that it is a rough, uneven track, abounding in
impediments and obstructions of no inconsiderable
magnitude, is a truth equally attested by the failure
of so many brilliant geniuses, who either turn back
discouraged, or faint by the way-side, without so
much as reaching the half-way house to distinction.
While a few, by dint of persevering energy, succeed
in elevating themselves to that rank in the
profession
which brings with it wealth, honour, and
influence
,
many a mettlesome blade is brought to
a premature edge upon the legal Blackstone, only
to corrode and rust in oblivion.
Such miscarriages must be accounted for on the
principle that larnin' isn't sense, and their
frequent
occurrence but serves to illustrate the truth,
that a certain amount of mother wit is quite as
requisite
a qualification in a lawyer as in a
scissors-grinder
.
For what is knowledge without wisdom?
Napoleon might have possessed all the military
knowledge of his day, and fought his battles by
diagram, and prosecuted his campaigns by theory,
but without the popular talents by which he was
enabled to put his great political machinery in
motion
,
and to direct and control its action in detail,
Europe would have remained undisturbed, and
himself unknown to fame. So might Thomas
Jefferson
Jenkins have read Blackstone and Chitty,
and Coke, and all the legal writers from Justinian
down, and stored his head with legal lore, until
there had been nothing left to learn, and still
remained
in poverty and obscurity, had he not
possessed
the tact, genius, common sense, or whatever
you choose to call it, which enabled him to turn his
acquirements to account.
But before we proceed further with our sketch, it
is proper that we should give the reader a formal
introduction to our hero, whose claim to the
appellation
abnormis sapiens
, we hope to establish by the
relation of a few prominent incidents in his career.
Imagine yourself, then, dear reader,
vis  vis
with
a tall, slight-made young gentleman, in shabby
genteel
,
with straight, light hair, deep-set gray eyes,
white eye-brows and freckled face. This is Thomas
Jefferson Jenkins, Esq.; and now that you know
him by sight, we will proceed to relate the incidents
aforesaid, trusting that he may, notwithstanding his
uncomely face, grow in your favourable regard, as
you become better acquainted with his character.
8*
We might, perhaps, interest the reader by
detailing
the early struggles of genius in the pursuit of
knowledge under difficulties, but it will be
sufficient
for the purposes we have in view, merely to
glance at the early history of our hero. Thomas
Jefferson was not only the architect of his own
fortune
,
but, in accordance with that perverse destiny
which often deprives us of our greatest help in our
greatest need, he was left at a tender age to settle
the foundation upon which his superstructure was
afterwards to be reared. With only a mother to
guide his infant steps, he trod the path of adversity,
and early imbibed, in that severe school, so much
extolled by those who have never been compelled
to submit to its rugged discipline, many a
wholesome
lesson. He had learned to
feel
and if he
felt the scorn of the purse-proud, and the neglect
of the
respectable
, he felt, too, a consciousness of his
own integrity, and a firm reliance in his own powers.
Laudably ambitious, and unwilling to yield the palm
exclusively to those whose only advantage consisted
in the better opportunities secured to them by their
wealth, he aspired to the legal profession; and, with
only the self-acquired rudiments of an education,
applied
himself to the study, subsisting upon the meager
savings from his own industry, until he had qualified
himself for admission to the bar. A lawyer by
license, he was not slow to discover that the city of
his birth was no field for him. He had no wealth or
family alliance to buoy him up, and as his success in
life depended directly and solely upon his own
exertions
,
he wisely determined to employ them where
the competition would be less formidable, and where
at least he would be free from the disparaging
influence
of prejudice. Thus Pineville became the theatre
of his professional career.
Thomas Jefferson Jenkins had learned enough of
the world to know, that, go where you will,
appearances
go a great ways, and he resolved to put the
best foot foremost, and to win by a show of
consequence
,
all who might not be capable of
appreciating
substantial merit, trusting to the practice of
that fidelity and prompt attention to business
which he had announced upon his card, ultimately
to gain the confidence of that portion of the
community
who were not to be taken by mere
ad captandum
means. Accordingly, he engaged board at the hotel,
hired a smart servant, and rented an office on the
square, over the door of which he placed a
sign-board
,
inscribed with gilt letters
THOMAS JEFFERSON JENKINS,
ATTORNEY AND COUNSELLOR AT LAW.
Upon a baize-covered table he spread his writing
apparatus, with a few books and such loose
pamphlets
and periodicals as wouldn't stand up endwise
on his shelves, which latter were conspicuously
posted
,
and presented the appearance of being well filled
the best bound volumes being exposed, while the
curtains carelessly hid from view those that were not
there. Determined to be Jef. Jenkins no longer, but
to sustain the character of Thomas, Jefferson Jenkins,
Esq., in a becoming manner, he at once assumed an
air of proper professional dignity, and mingling but
little with the most reputable men in the village, kept
the crowd at such respectful distance as to avoid all
risk of incurring the penalty of that maxim, which,
to relieve it of its triteness, has been renderedtoo
much familiarity breeds despise.
Of course the advent of such a young gentleman, in
such a village, was a matter of considerable interest
to the inhabitants, and served for a theme of
speculation
,
wonderment, and inquiry, for many weeks.
The men desired to know whether he was a Clarke
or Troupe-manthe old ladies wondered if he was
rich, and the young ladies thought he wasn't
handsome
a bit. Some were curious to know whether
he was any relation to the Jenkinses of , and
whether his family were
respectable;
but the question
never once entered their heads whether the young
man possessed any claim to their consideration on his
own account. Be it said, however, to the honour
of Pineville, these latter querists comprised but a
meager portion of the community, consisting only of
a limited circle of would-be aristocracy, who,
destitute
of intrinsic merit themselves, affect to despise it
in others, while they bestow all honour upon mere
fortuitous advantages, which fools may inherit and
ignorance acquire.
Such a sign-board as our hero's had never before
been exhibited in Pineville, and there was much
speculation among the children and negroes, as to
what the stranger had to sell; and it was not
unfrequently
that he was disturbed in his studies by
inquiries
for salt, iron, molasses, or some other of the
leading articles, by people from the country, who
had never dreamed of a 'squire's office having a
sign to it. But when our hero appeared at the
door, in his office gown, backed by such an array
of books and papers, and blandly informed the
inquirers
that they were mistaken in the place, that his
was a law-office, and directed them across the street,
where they would find whatever they wanted in the
grocery line, the intruders left him with feelings akin
to awe, and thereafter lost no opportunity of adding
their mite to the current gossip about the strange
young gentleman. It was rarely that 'Squire Jenkins
was seen in the street in the day, and while the young
men of the town held their nightly court about the
hotel door, to talk over the news of the day, and
regale
themselves with idle jokes and anecdotes, he
sought the companionship of his books, and often
when the last villager retired to rest, the light of the
young 'squire's solitary lamp still shone from his
office windows.
By these and various other wise expedients,
Thomas
Jefferson Jenkins, Esq., managed to keep a good
head of public opinion in his favour. But what of
that, if it did not bring grist to his Mill?
Popularity
would not pay board-bills and washerwomen,
and he began to apprehend a crisis in his affairs,
unless
he could fall upon some expedient whereby to
replenish his finances. Thomas was a practical
philosopher
,
and was not given to hope against reason
he knew that manna had not rained from heaven
within his recollection, and he had no more idea of
fees falling into his pocket by chance than he had
of being made chief justice within the year. Thus
far he had not had a client. True he had been
applied
to for advice in a few simple cases, and had
drawn a few instruments of writing, such as deeds,
bills of sale, and notes of hand, for his neighbours,
but these slight services had been solicited of him in
a neighbourly way, by persons who did not expect
to pay any thing just for a sheet of paper and a few
minutes' labour, and he was under the necessity of
docketing such services under the head of one good
turn deserves anotherwhich, with most people,
means,when you don't intend to pay your money,
it is expedient to discount your benevolence.
But, as we have intimated, Thomas Jefferson
Jenkins's
finances were getting alarmingly lowthe fare
at his landlord's table began to taste as if it wasn't
paid for, his best coat was becoming threadbare at
the elbows, and his slumbers were nightly disturbed
by apparitions of haggard washerwomen, extending
their shrivelled hands, and with shrill discordant
voices demanding payment for that last dozen; and
every day but settled the conviction deeper and
deeper in his mind, that some means
must
be
speedily
adopted to bring him into a more lucrative practice.
Long hours he sat cross-legged in his arm-chair, and
with chin in rest, mused over the cheerless prospect,
and yet no ray of promise dawned upon his
desponding
hopes. He would have suffered a moderate
battery
of his own person for the privilege of making out
the case in court, and was sorely tempted to commit
some breach of law himself, in the hope that by his
defence he might create a diversion in his favour.
In this painful perplexity of mind, as was natural
enough for a young man of his temperament, Thomas
Jefferson Jenkins, Esq., contracted a habit of
whittling! which led him to frequent the large
white-pine
box, which Mr. Harley, in accordance with the
universal custom of country merchants, had placed in
front of his store-door, for the accommodation of the
whittling loafers of the village. One afternoon, while
sitting upon the aforesaid box, all the faculties of his
mind engaged in serious deliberation as a committee
of ways and means, and his knife running freely into
the soft pine, his attention was arrested by the
whickering
and restive movements of a little half starved,
sway-backed, blind poney, that stood by the
horse-rack
,
attached to a small cart, in which were a few
small paper bundles and a large stone jug, stopped
with a corn-cob. The establishment belonged to one
Josiah Perkins, of Ticklegizzard settlement, who, in
company with his wife and two or three of his
neighbours
,
had visited town that day, on a trafficking
expedition
.
Their stock in trade, consisting of a few
dozen eggs, as many pounds of butter, and a few quarts
of whortleberries, had been disposed of, and their
proceeds
expended in the purchase of sundry articles of
prime necessity, such as homespun, rum and tobacco,
and the party were now mustering for the purpose of
taking their departure for home. But Si Perkins, as
he was familiarly called, was missing, and while his
wife was in anxious search of him, Boss Ankles and
Bill Sweeny, who comprised the balance of the party,
were busily engaged in talking politics, over a
half-pint
in the measure, which Mr. Harley had judiciously
thrown out as a bait for their future trade.
Desperate cases prompt desperate remediesand
though it was not easy to surmise in what way
advantage
could possibly accrue from such an
expedient
,
our hero conceived a mischievous design upon
the innocent and unsuspecting poney, which he
resolved
at once to put in execution, trusting to chance
and his own ingenuity to turn the consequences to
the advancement of his own especial interests.
Accordingly
,
he seized the first favourable opportunity
when the confusion of voices within was loudest
to conduct Si Perkins's marketing equipage,
unobserved
,
to the rear of the storethen opening the
large old-fashioned cellar-door, he backed horse and
cart into the cellar, and hastily throwing into the cart
a few of the first articles upon which he could lay his
hands, reascended, closed and fastened the door after
him, and quietly resumed his seat upon the box.
He had not been long reseated when Si Perkins
who had been discovered by his wife at the grocery
on the opposite side of the square, while in the act
of negotiating the preliminaries of a fight about the
Troupe treatymade his appearance and passed into
the store to take a parting leave of Mr. Harley. But
Mr. Harley had stepped out, and it was while
waiting
that gentleman's return, that the observant Mrs.
Perkins made the astounding discovery that the
cretur was gone!
Thar, now, Si, said she, you see what comes
of your projectin' about town, when you ought to be
gwine home. The horse and cart is done gone, and
every thing in it!
Si hastened to the door, and raising his slouched
hat from his eyes, took a brief survey of the street
in every directionthen turning to his wife, with a
countenance expressive of the most painful anxiety,
he inquired
Did you put the sperits in, Nancy?
To be sure I did, and the truck, too, replied
his wife.
Well, now! exclaimed Siyou
is
done it!
here's a business! But that's always the way with
youthere's everlastin'ly something happenin'
whenever
Si Perkins! exclaimed the little sharp-visaged
woman, darting at him a glance from her small black
eyes, that would have dislocated every bone in his
body had he not been accustomed to its infliction.
Yes, she resumed after a pause, during which Si's
heart ceased to beat, you better hush layin' it on
me!I wonder if I wasn't trampoosin' all over the
place to find youand whar was you when I found
you?round to that 'bominable grocery, tryin' to
kick up a fight 'long with Bill Pilcherand you
may thank me that you's got eyes left in yer dratted
head to look for yer blind horse!
That speech was enough for Si, considering its
source, and he at once set about searching for the
missing horse and cart. The balance of the
Ticklegizzard
party, bearing in mind that there was a jug
of rum in the case, were prompt to lend their aid.
Away they scattered in every direction, inquiring
of everybody they met if they had seed any thing
of a blind horse and cart, with a jug in it? But all
their efforts were vain,they could get no tidings
9
of the objects of their search, and one after another
they returned to the store, to report the result of their
investigations and to take counsel as to what course
was best to be pursued. Mr. Harley, who had
returned
in the mean time, was of opinion that the
animal
had gone home, and that there was no occasion
for giving themselves any further uneasiness about
the matter.
But Si Perkins knew better than that
Who ever hearn, said he, of a blind horse
gwine home, six miles, all alone by himself?
That's a fact, remarked Boss Ankles, it aint
in natur for 'em to do it, no more'n it was for my hat
and shoes to went off by 'emselves that time.
Somebody's
tuck that horse, Si Perkins, you may depend.
Yes, added Bill Sweeny, and that licker's as
clear a gone as ever was.
But who upon yeath could went and stol'd 'em
right here in broad daylight, 'thout nobody seein'
'em?
Never you mind that, said Boss Ankles,
ther's plenty of meanery and shecoonery in this
town to do any thing.
Just at this stage of the deliberations, our hero,
who had been all the while intently engaged in
carving
the pine-box upon which he sat, affected to
overhear
the conversation of the anxious group that was
assembled near the store-door, and to become
interested
in the subject of their investigation.
Approaching
them he inquired
Was it a little sun-burnt sorrel horse?
Yes! answered two at once.
With a bobtail?
Yes!
In a small cart with a new body?
Yes, with a jug in it, answered a trio of voices,
while the whole party gazed with eager expectation
into the face of the interrogator.
Well, said our hero, I saw such a horse and
cart standing hitched to that rack, not more than
fifteen minutes ago, and my opinion is that the horse
could not have got loose without help.
To be sure it couldn't, remarked Si, for I
hung him hard and fast, myself.
But even if he might have got loose, resumed
our hero, it is not probable that he could have got
out of sight so quick.
That's a fact, said Boss Ankles, and we've looked
all over town for 'em.
But, gentlemen, did you follow the track of the
cart?that would, if taken in time, most certainly
lead you to your property.
Well, bless my soul! exclaimed Perkins, why
didn't we think of that before! Come on, boys
the 'squire's got more sense than all of us put
together
come
on, and we'll soon see whar old Button's
been tuck to.
The next minute the whole party were pursuing
the track of the cart, which they trailed round to Mr.
Harley's back lot, through the gate into the yard,
and up to the cellar-door. In another minute the
door was opened, and Si Perkins had just succeeded
in urging his half-famished tuckey-up the steps, when
Mr. Harley's clerk, who was in the back room at
the time, attracted by the noise, thrust his head out
at the window, and saw the cart driving away from
the cellar with certain articles of unsold
merchandise
.
Shocked beyond measure at such a
high-handed
proceeding, Mr. Van Scoik rushed into the
front store exclaiming
Mr. Harley! Mr. Harley! do you think them
Ticklegizzard people aint out in the back lot,
carrying
off our goods by the cart-load!
The dI they are! exclaimed Mr. Harley,
leaping over the counter and hastening out, followed
by his clerk and the few persons that were in the
store.
Our hero joined to see the fun, secretly exulting
at the success of his scheme, and whispering to
himself
Now whether he sue Perkins,
Or Perkins him, or each do
sue
the other,
Every way makes my gain!
The party with the horse and cart were making
their way across the yard to the street, when the
astonished merchant and his friends came upon
them.
Stop that cart! you infernal scoundrel!
exclaimed
Mr. Harley.
Si would have stopped the speaker's mouth with
his fist, but that it required the active employment
of both his hands to guide the movements of his
affrighted nag. However, his tongue was free, and
with it he gave Mr. Harley as good as he sent,
until
the latter ordered his clerk to seize the reins of
the animal. This movement caused others on both
sides to interfere, and a scuffle ensued, in which,
amid a torrent of oaths and imprecations, the cart
was overturned, Mr. Harley's face badly scratched
and some of his hair pulled out by Mrs. Perkins,
Mr. Van Scoik's spectacles broken across his nose,
and other slight damages done to sundry persons.
It is uncertain how the affair would have ended,
had it not been for the timely arrival of 'Squire
Rogers
,
who promptly commanded the peace.
Oh, yes, exclaimed Si, as he and his friends
were busied in righting the cartdadfetch your
everlastin' picteryou was certain they was gone
home, was you?and you wouldn't give yourself
no more trouble about 'em. You oudacious old
swindlin' cus! But I'll have the law of youI'll
show you how to steal people's horses and carts
agin!
Mr. Harley, still panting from the effect of his
encounter with the woman, stood in a sort of
bewilderment
,
pointing to the articles which lay
strewed upon the ground
Just look, said he, at the bacon and things
that scoundrel was carrying off!
Oh, yes! you old thief-o'-thunder, you needn't
try to turn it off that-a-way. I always thought you
wasn't none too good to steal, but now I've got pint
blank proof again you.
Well, I always had a good opinion of Mr.
Harley
,
though I have hearn a deal of talk about him,
said Boss Ankles. But this looks monstrous
'spicious
,
that's a fact.
Oh, I'll give my Bible affydavy that he stold
9*
the horse and cart, and hid 'em, and wouldn't tell
whar they was, added Bill Sweeny.
Yes, said Mrs. Perkins, and he ought to go
to the penitentiary this very minitthe old squinch
owlso he ought.
While Mr. Harley and his clerk were busied in
removing the bacon and other articles that had been
taken from the cellar, the Perkins party regained
the street, where, after a brief consultation, it was
determined to prosecute Mr. Harley for stealing,
and, in order to prevent any miscarriage in the
business
,
to employ the young 'squire, of whose
sagacity
they had recently had such convincing proof,
to conduct the case.
Accordingly, a warrant was issued by 'Squire
Rogers, summoning Absalom Harley forthwith to
appear before him, to answer to the charge of
larceny
,
upon the complaint of Josiah Perkins.
There had been a dearth of incident in Pineville
for some time, and the various exaggerated reports
of the affair that had given rise to the prosecution
which soon spread throughout the townhad the
effect to assemble a considerable concourse of
people
at the magistrate's office to witness the
proceedings
.
Like most men, Mr. Harley had his enemies
as well as friends, and, as is usually the case in small
villages, friends and foes took opposite sides, and
the matter began to assume the character of a party
question. While some were shocked beyond
measure
at the proceeding, and did not hesitate to
express
the opinion that Perkins was himself the thief,
an equal number were as ready to credit the
accusation
against Mr. Harley; in which opinion their
judgments were fortified by the sudden recollection
of numerous transactions in the past history of that
gentleman, which they never
had
been able to
reconcile
with their own notions of honesty and fair
dealing.
But to proceed with the case of
State
vs.
Absalom Harley
.
Mr. Harley having made his appearance, and the
witnesses being all in attendance, 'Squire Rogers
proceeded with due formality to make the necessary
preparations for entering upon the discharge of his
official duties. Having arranged his books and
papers (comprising a Digest of the Laws of Georgia,
a copy of the Bible, an Almanac for the year,
and a half-quire of foolscap paper) upon the table
before him, he wiped his spectacles with his
handkerchief
,
and placed them deliberately astride of his
nosethen assuming an air of judicial gravity, for
which his face was most admirably adapted,and
which, in the honest man's opinion, was a highly
important function of the magisterial office,he
ordered
Snipe, the constable, to bring a fresh pitcher
of waterafter which he announced that he was
ready to proceed in the investigation of the case.
At the request of the magistrate, Thomas Jefferson
Jenkins, Esq.,who, with a considerable number
of legal books, occupied one end of the 'squire's
tablerose and read the warrant. Mr. Harley
listened
with an air of incredulous unconcern, which,
by the unprejudiced, was considered as strongly
indicative
of his innocence, but which the opposite
party regarded as the brazen-faced insolence of
casehardened
guilt.
Absalom Harley, said 'Squire Rogers in a very
solemn and imposing manner, you have hearn the
charge agin youis you got any answer to make to
this court?
Mr. Harley was about to speak, but, unfortunately
for him, could not resist a laugh at the ludicrous
position in which he found himself. Such conduct
would have prejudiced a better cause
Silence in court! exclaimed the outraged
magistrate
.
Then leaning forward and gazing fiercely
in the face of the prisoner, until his eyes became
green with venom, he continuedIs you laughin'
at this court, sir?this court didn't come here, sir,
to be laughed at, not by no kinds of character, sir.
This court are the law of the land, sirand no kind
of character whatsomever has a right to make game
of the law, sir
Why, Rogers, I'm
This court aint name Rogers, sirthis court
don't know nobody but the lawthis court are a
regular constitootional authority, and aint
irresponsible
to nobody but justice and the laws of Georgia.
But I meant no disrespect to
Silence, sirthis court don't disrespect nobody
out of the lawthis court, sir, are a court, and don't
know who's guilty till they prove themselves
innocent
according to law, for this court are blind out
of the law, and don't know nothing.
That's a fact, interrupted Harley, adding in
an under-toneand it is useless to multiply words,
for this court are a dd fool!
Is you gwine to answer the question of this
court? peremptorily demanded the 'squire, too
much enraged to hear the concluding remark of the
prisoner. Is you guilty or not guilty?
Of course I'm not guilty, replied Harley, who
by this time had come to understand that he had
nothing to expect from this court, but what he
might be entitled to under its strictest construction
of the law; and he now began to feel some degree
of solicitude in a matter which he had at first
regarded
as utterly ridiculous.
Well, sir, we'll see about that, said the 'squire,
in a severe tone. 'Squire Jinkins, you may
proceed
with the case.
All eyes were immediately turned upon the young
lawyer, who, rising gracefully from his seat, after a
slight effort to clear his throat, proceeded to open
the case. The angry altercation that had just taken
place, had served to show him the weak side of the
official dignitary whose favourable regard it was of
such vital importance he should gain, and he had
like to have commenced his address with most
potent, grave, and reverend seignor, but
apprehending
that he might possibly overcharge the old
gentleman's vanity, he contented himself with less
magniloquent phrase
May it please this very honourable court,
remarked
our hero, this is a case of simple larceny,
in which my client, Mr. Josiah Perkins, a worthy
citizen of this county, appears as prosecutor against
Absalom Harley, merchant of this place. The
particular
circumstances of the larceny, we will, with
your honour's permission, proceed more fully to
set forth and substantiate to the satisfaction of this
honourable court, by good and sufficient testimony.
Your honour will please to swear Mr. William
Sweeny, Mr. Boss Ankles, Mr. Josiah Perkins, and
Mrs. Nancy Perkins.
'Squire Rogers rose from his seat with the stately
gravity of a high-chancellor, and, after instructing
the witnesses with which hand, and how they should
hold the book, administered the oath in the most
solemn and impressive manner. Si Perkins and
Bill Sweeny grasped the volume firmly and kissed
it resolutely, while Boss Ankles, whose lips had,
perhaps, never before come in so close contact with
truth, but had often sipped from Mr. Harley's pint
measure, turned quite pale and cast his eyes to the
floor. Mrs. Perkins had been in a pet all afternoon,
and saluted the calfskin as a toad catches flies
so quick that few saw the operation.
The prosecutor was then examined.
Mr. Perkins, said our hero, you will now
please to state to this honourable court, all the
particulars
in relation to this transaction.
'Zactly, 'squire, that's jest what I want to do.
Well, you must know that Nancy was wantin' some
little fineries, and the childer's clothes was gittin'
monstrous raggedy, and
Please confine yourself, Mr. Perkins, to the
matter under consideration, interrupted the
prosecutor's
counsel.
Jes so, 'squire, that's what I'm comin' toand
the baby had the rickets, and wanted some doctor's
stuff, so Nancy was at me for up'ards of a week to
put Button in the cart and come to town with her,
and
Very well, Mr. Perkins, after you came to town,
you went to Mr. Harley's store to trade?
To be sure we did, and bought a heap o' truck,
and some things he did stick it to us monstrous in
the price, and Nancy said to me, ses she
Never mind what Nancy said, Mr. Perkins.
Where were your horse and cart while you were
trading with Mr. Harley?
Bless your soul, they was right out before the
door, tied hard and fast to the horse-rack. But I
jest want to tell you what a audacious rascal he is.
Ses Nancy to me, ses she, `Si'
Never mind, Mr. Perkins, we will endeavour
to make that appear presently. When did you first
miss your horse and cart?
Well, you see, after we was done buyin' the
things, I went over to the grocery a bit, to see Sam
Culpepper, 'bout a pair o' plough-lines what his
nigger feller borried last spring, and
Very well, that's enough about the plough-lines.
But when you came back
'Zactly, when I come back to the store, drat
the horse and cart was to be seen anywhar about
and Nancy, she come after me to go home, and ses
she to me, `Now, Si'
This court can't hear
what
Nancy said!
interrupted
'Squire Rogers, turning abruptly to the witness.
Well, resumed Si, raising his voice to the
highest possible pitchNancy ses to me, ses she,
there, now
Silence! shet your mouth! commanded the
enraged magistrateThis court's got as good ears
as any man, but they aint for to hear no old woman's
gabblement, 'thout its under oath.
But 'squire, I thought
Hush your mouth, I tell you! You haint got no
business to think in court. This court don't qualify
no witness to think. Now, sir, go on with yer
state
ment
, and don't be a circumlocutin' all over
God's yeath, or this court 'll find a way to subtract
the truth from you, sir.
His honour is right, resumed our hero. A
witness should confine himself to facts only. You
will, therefore, proceed, Mr. Perkins, to inform this
honourable court, in as brief manner as possible,
how and where you recovered your property.
Which? inquired the mortified prosecutor.
Please inform his honour where you found the
horse and cart.
Why, down in Ab. Harley's cellar.
Did Mr. Harley show them to you?
That he didn't. He said he didn't know
nothing
about 'em, but 'lowed they was gone home,
and after I and Ankles and Sweeny looked
everywhar
for 'em and couldn't find 'em nowhar, we
tuck the track of the cart, and follered it right up
to the cellar-door.
Was the door closed?
Well, it was. It was shet down tight, and the
iron bar put over the thing what holds it, but it
wasn't locked.
Well, what followed, Mr. Perkins?
Why, jest as soon as me and Sweeny opened
the door, old Button he whickered at us, and I went
down and brung him out, and we was carryin' him
out of the yard, when here comes old Harley and
that long-legged feller, Van Squoik, and kicked up
a terrible rumpus, and skeered the horse, and upset
the cart, and like to mashed every thing all to
flinders
.
Do you live in this county, Mr. Perkins?
Yes, sir, all my life.
Where and when did this transaction take
place?
Why, over thar at the store, not more'n a hour
ago.
Very well, Mr. Perkins, you may stand aside.
The substance of his testimony having been
written
down by his counsel, it was duly subscribed to
and reaffirmed by the prosecutor, after which it was
submitted to the honourable court.
Mrs. Nancy Perkins was next examined.
You will please to state, Mrs. Perkins, said
the counsel for the prosecutor, what occurred
to-day
at Mr. Harley's store, after you had concluded
your purchases.
Why, remarked the little sharp-visaged woman,
in a peculiarly rapid and emphatic manner, after,
the things, was all done, wrapped up, and, paid for,
Si, he 'lowed, he'd, jest step across, the square, a
bit, while I, put 'em, all in, the cart, and, got ready,
10
to go home. Well, after he was gone, Mr. Harley's
man (now, I'm jest a-gwine to tell, the whole
bisness
,
jest as it was,) he tuck Ankles, and Sweeny,
into the back room, and, gin 'em some licker, and,
thar they was, drinkin', and runnin on, with all
manner, of nonsense, while I, waited, and waited,
for Si, till, I was, completely, done out. Bimeby,
Mr. Harley, he 'lowed, I'd better, go after Si, if I
wanted him, to go home, to-night; so I went, and,
found him, over, to the grocery, and, when we come
back, the horse, and cart, was gone, and, after we,
looked, everywhar, for 'em, we found 'em, hid
away, in, Mr. Harley's cellar. And, that's, the
whole, truth, about it.
Sweeny's testimony fully corroborated that of the
prosecutor, and though Ankles was more cautious
than the rest, and was extremely careful to state
nothing positively, but only according to the best
of his knowledge and belief, the weight of his
evidence
went to strengthen the presumption against
the prisoner.
Mr. Harley declined asking the witnesses any
questions, and having none to adduce in his own
behalf, he relied for his defence solely upon the
deficiency in the evidence as made out by the
prosecutor. He reminded the honourable court that
there was no evidence before it that implicated him
in the slightest degree, and expressed a confident
hope, that though false statements had been made
under oath, by the prosecutor, for the purpose of
covering his own guilt, no one in the community
in which he had lived for many years, would
believe him guilty of the charge preferred against
him.
There was a moment of breathless silence, while
our hero was arranging his notes and authorities
preparatory to making his maiden speech. 'Squire
Rogers condescendingly turned his benign
countenance
upon him, as he thus addressed the court
May it please your honourI doubt not but that
your honour has participated with me in the utter
astonishment with which I have listened to the
defence
set up in this case,if, indeed, it may be
called a defence. I am as yet young in the practice
of the law, but I trust, sir, that if I should, like your
honour, live to grow gray in legal experience, I will
never again witness such a miserable exhibition in
a court of justice. Why, sir, what is the defence
relied on in this case?simply the alleged
inconclusiveness
of the testimony on the part of the
prosecution
.
And let us see what this testimony is.
We have proven, by three respectable witnesses,
that the horse and cart of my client were at a certain
time standing before the prisoner's door, that he
decoyed
two of the witnesses into the back room of
his store, and afterwards persuaded the other
witness
to go in search of her husbandthat while she
was absent the horse and cart were taken, and that
after the prisoner had denied all knowledge of them,
they were traced to his cellar, where they were
found, secreted away out of sight. Now, I would
ask your honour, what further testimony, short of
positive proof of the actual caption, would the
prisoner
have us introduce into this court, in order to
establish his guilt? But, may it please your honour,
I am willing to throw aside all these concurrent
circumstances
in
themselves more than sufficient to
establish the larceny,and rest the validity of my
client's cause simply upon the fact of the
possession
,
under the circumstances in which we have shown
it to this honourable court. By reference to the
books we will find that,
ita lex scripta est
To
constitute
the offence of larceny, it is necessary that
there should be a caption and asportation, with a
felonious intention, of the goods of another. Now,
may it please your honour, the
possession
of goods
or chattels, which have been taken from another
person having a right to them, without his consent,
and unaccounted for, is
prima facie
evidence of the
caption and asportation, with felonious intent. In
other words, if a man be in
possession
of goods or
chattels under such circumstances, the law requires
him to account for his possession, which it thus
regards
as presumptive evidence of larceny, applying
the maxim,
stabitur presumptioni donec probitur in
contrarium
. (Here the honourable court's mouth
unconsciously dropped open to its fullest extent.)
And if he fail to account for this possession by other
testimony than his own, he must be convicted.
This sort of presumption, may it please your honour,
is more or less strong, according as the possession
is more or less recent. The more recent the
possession
,
the stronger the case. For these
well-established
principles of law, I need hardly refer this
intelligent court to East's Pleas of the Crown, 656;
Hale's Pleas of the Crown, 290; 2 Starkie on
Evidence
,
840; Addison's Reports, 320; Archbold's
Practice, 76, and numerous other learned
authorities
.
Nor need I occupy the time of this honourable
court by applying these principles to the case under
consideration. I will, may it please your honour,
only remark in conclusion, that we have abundantly
proven the
possession
of our property by the
defendant
without our knowledge or consent, and as he
has utterly failed to account for that possession, this
honourable court is bound to presume that he took
the property
animo furandi
, and to commit him
accordingly
.
If there were any doubts resting on the mind of
'Squire Rogers before, this speech, so replete with
complimentary allusions to his honour's sagacity,
and abounding with legal terms so utterly beyond
his comprehension, had the effect to disperse them
at once, and to irrevocably fix his conviction of the
prisoner's guilt.
After a moment's silence, during which 'Squire
Rogers looked unusually wise, he thus delivered
the judgment of the court.
Absalom Harley, you is committed by this court,
to the amount of five hundred dollars for your
appearance
to the next honourable Superior Court.
While this decision gave evident satisfaction to a
large number of the persons present, there were yet
some who regarded it as wholly unjust,
notwithstanding
the able arguments of counsel. And as
Mr. Harley had before intimated his intention of
prosecuting Perkins, he was now strenuously urged
to do so, by his friends, who suggested that as he
10*
had fallen under the displeasure of the magistrate,
his true policy would be to employ the young
lawyer
who,
it was evident to all, had won a high
place in his honour's favourable regardto
conduct
the suit.
It required much persuasion to induce Mr.
Harley
to adopt this latter suggestion. After what had
just taken place, he felt much more like seeing
Thomas Jefferson Jenkins, Esq., to the dl, as
the saying is, than giving him a fee. But, on being
reminded of the utter hopelessness of his case unless
he should succeed in overcoming the prejudices of
'Squire Rogers, and being assured by uncle Hearty,
that Lawyers is like shot-guns, and hits whoever
they's pinted at, 'thout any malice prepens, he
waived his objection, and consented to employ the
same weapon against Perkins which that individual
had so successfully directed against himself.
Accordingly
,
through his friends, he approached our
hero on the subject, who he found not only perfectly
willing to advise him in his case, but, as he
expressed
it, extremely happy to have an opportunity
thus afforded him of proving to Mr. Harley, the
total absence of any thing like feelings of personal
hostility, on his part, towards him.
After hearing the evidence upon which Mr. Harley
relied to sustain the prosecution, our hero remarked
that the
gist
of the action was unquestionably the
same in both cases, and that though it was not usual
in the practice, for a gentleman of his profession to
prosecute his own client, and by doing so he might
possibly expose himself to the unjust sarcasm,
iras
et verba locunt
, yet, under the circumstances, he
did not think that his opinion, given
super subjectam
materiam
, in the first case, ought to operate as a
bar to prevent his acceptance of a fee in the one
now about to be brought; adding, that he had not
a doubt but that he could, from the evidence,
convict
the whole Ticklegizzard party of the offence of
larceny from the house!
Mr. Harley was delighted
at the prospect of wreaking his vengeance upon
those who had sworn so lustily against him, but
conscientiously reminded his counsel that the goods
were taken from the
cellar
to which our hero
replied
,
that that fact was perfectly immaterial to the
issue.
Accordingly, while 'Squire Rogers was
transcribing
the form of a bond from the Georgia Justice, in
the case of The State
vs.
Harley, our hero was
busily engaged in drafting the necessary papers in
the new prosecution.
Immediately upon the decision of their case, the
Ticklegizzard party had withdrawn, in boisterous
triumph, to their cart, where, with numerous friends,
they made a desperate attack upon the contents of
the stone jug. Si Perkins, who was unusually elated
on the occasion, made a speech from his cart-body.
Boys, said he, I can jest tell you what it is
that 'Squire Jinkins is a leetle bit the smartest
man in these parts! Did you ever
hear
sich a
speech? And the way he knows the law from old
Moses up, is perfectly 'mazin'. Why, he can talk
more sense in a minute than old Rogers can
understand
in a coon's age. And what's more, he's my
candydate for the next legislater, agin old Nippers
or anybody else. Hurra for Jinkins!
Three cheers for Jinkins! shouted the crowd
unanimously. Hurra! hurra!! hurra!!!
Stop, boys, for a senti
ment!
exclaimed Bill
Sweeny, with the jug in his hand. I give you
old Ab. Harley
He thought he was monstrous smart,
To steal Si Perkins's horse and cart
But lawyer Jinkins has tuck him into tow,
And now to the penitentiary he will go!
A loud hurra followed the delivery of Bill Sweeny's
impromptu, which had not entirely died away, when
Constable Snipe made his appearance in their midst,
with the warrant for Perkins, Ankles, and Sweeny
Mrs. Perkins having been omitted by courtesy of
the prosecutor.
The summons of the 'squire came upon them like
a clap of thunder out of a clear sky, and their hearts
quaked with fear while the shout of triumph yet
lingered
upon their lips. The jug was immediately
called in, the corn-cob replaced in its neck, and
the party, attended by their astonished friends,
repaired
to the magistrate's office. 'Squire Rogers's
surprise at the strange proceeding had, after our
hero's brief explanation, somewhat subsided, and
he was prepared to receive the new culprits with
his wonted calm and dignified composure of
manner
.
After some little preliminary arrangement, his
honour announced that he was ready to proceed
in the investigation of the case of
State
vs.
Josiah Perkins, William Sweeny, and
Boss Ankles
.
The proceedings were formally opened by the
reading of Mr. Harley's affidavit, to which the
prisoners
listened in utter amazement, and when the
usual question was propounded, they unanimously
declared themselves not guilty of no sich doin's.
But what was their surprise and consternation, when
they beheld their late counsel, Si Perkins's own
candidate
for the legislature, rise and state the case on
behalf of the prosecution
This, may it please your honour, said our hero,
is a case of Larceny from the House, which differs
from the case which has just been so ably decided
by your honour, only in a single feature. In this
case the goods were taken from the enclosure of the
prosecutor. Though this circumstance alters the
grade of the offence, the principles of law by which
the case is to be decided are precisely the same,
and if we can establish the
possession
before this
honourable court, by good and sufficient testimony,
it will then devolve upon the prisoners to account
for that possession, in default of which we will be
entitled to a commitment. We will now, may it
please your honour, introduce testimony to prove
1st, the possession by Perkins, and 2d, the
participation
of Ankles and Sweeny in the felony, as
principals
in the second degree. Your honour will please
to qualify Absalom Harley, Eugenius Augustus Van
Scoik, and Jonathan Hearty.
The witnesses being sworn, Mr. Harley was first
examined.
Prosecutor's Testimony
.Prisoners had been
trading at witness's storewhen witness returned
from the post-office, understood that prisoners had
lost their cartsaw no more of them for some time
was selling Mr. Hearty a pair of suspenders when
clerk informed him that prisoners were in the back
yard carrying off his goodswitness ran out to stop
themmet them coming with the cart from the
cellar
prisoners
were all in companyordered Perkins
to stopprisoner refused, and Sweeny said he would
break witness's dd old bald pate if he touched the
cartthere were several sides of bacon, one coil of
bale-rope, two pieces of bagging, and one iron
tea-kettle
in the cart at the time, all the property of
witnesswhen clerk caught the bridle of the horse,
Ankles and Sweeny interferedthe cart was
overturned
,
and witness recovered his property with
great difficultythe transaction occurred to-day, in
this countywitness is a citizen of this county.
The testimony of both the other witnesses fully
corroborated the statement of the prosecutor. On
the part of the defence, the prisoners adhered to
their former statement, denying any knowledge of
the goods alleged to have been stolen.
Counsel for Prosecution
.May it please this
honourable court, as it is growing late I will occupy
your honour's time but a few minutes in arguing
a case which, I doubt not your honour will agree
with me, is too plain to admit of argument. I will
only remark that in this, as in the former case, the
possession proven is not satisfactorily accounted for
by the testimony of the prisoners; which, in the
absence of positive proof, the law holds to be
presumptive
evidence of the felonious intention. The
fact that the prisoner Perkins
might
have gone down
into our cellar to recover his horse, does not
authorize
the presumption that he gathered up our goods
and carried them off in his cart by mistake; nor is
the
asportation
in the slightest degree purged by the
subsequent surrender or abandonment of the goods,
even though the possession was but momentary.
(See 1 Hawkins, c. 33; Leach, 267; Hale, 533.)
However, not doubting but that your honour will at
once perceive the striking similitude of the cases,
so far as the
possession
is relied on, I will leave your
honour to adopt the maxim,
res judicata pro veritate
accipitur
, and pass to the other branch of the
testimony
,
by which we seek to involve the prisoners,
Ankles and Sweeny, as principals in the second
degree
.
A principal in the second degree, may it
please your honour, is a person who is present
aiding
and abetting the fact to be done, and in the
proof it is only necessary to show that he was near
enough to lend his assistance in any manner to the
commission of the offence. (See 2 Starkie on
Evidence
,
6; Hale's Pleas of the Crown, 615.) Now,
may it please your honour, we have shown the
prisoners
not only to have been present at the time,
but, by their own admission, to have been
actively
assisting
the principal, Perkins, in the commission
of the larceny. We, therefore, most confidently ask
of this honourable court, the commitment of the
prisoners
.
'Squire Rogers mustered up his sluggish intellect
and took a profound view of the case. It
did
look
like a rather wholesale business to commit both
parties
.
But the evidence was conclusive, and after
the law had been so ably expounded, he felt that it
would be sinning against light and knowledge to
give any other judgment in the case, than that so
confidently asked of his honour, by the young
prodigy of legal knowledge who had conducted the
prosecutions. Accordingly, the prisoners were duly
committed.
By this decision our hero won new laurels. The
Harley party were not less extravagant in their
applause
than the Ticklegizzard party had been, and
now all parties joined in extolling his talents, and
in pronouncing him unquestionably the ablest
lawyer
in the state. True, the sudden change in
relationship
which had taken place, had the effect to
somewhat abate the ardour of Si Perkins's friendship
but if he loved 'Squire Jinkins less, he feared
him more, which, with him, was an impulse quite
as strong, and subjected him even more readily to
the controlling influence of our hero.
With some little difficulty, the Ticklegizzard
party
were enabled to obtain bail; after which, they
pushed the war upon the brown jug to the death,
and then started for home, in a glorious flow of
spirits.
Thus matters rested until near the time for the
sitting of the Superior Court, when both parties
began to feel a little uneasy, and both applied to
'Squire Jenkins to defend them. But our hero
magnanimously declined being retained on either
side, and not only re-established himself in the good
opinion of both parties, but at the same time
successfully
covered his own intrigue, by setting on
foot a negotiation for a reconciliation, which resulted
in a mutual agreement not to prosecuteboth
parties
conceding that there certainly must have been
some mistake in the matter.
From the day of the trials, the name of Thomas
Jefferson Jenkins, Esq., spread far and wide
throughout
the country, a terror to all evil doers, and a
tower of strength in almost every law case.
Business
came in from all sides, and fat fees rewarded
his numerous triumphs. His politics were in the
minority in the county, but by his influence his
party soon gained the ascendancy, and, rising with
it, his aspirations after political promotion were
speedily gratified by a successful competition with
Mr. Nippers for a seat in the Legislative Council of
the state.
His talents(did we hear the reader yawn?)
Then tell thou the tale, say webut hadst thou
not crossed us, thou shouldst have heard how he
grew in the favour of the ladieshow the young
ones admired and the old ones praised himhow
he fell in love with a poor orphan girl, who had
been swindled by her guardian out of a large estate
how he sued for and recovered the fortune and
married the young ladywhat a talk it made in
Pinevilleand how (after she had got her property)
everybody thought she was handsomeand how
the respectable people always knew that she had
been brought up a lady,and how happily 'Squire
11
Jenkins and Mrs. 'Squire Jenkins lived together
and how many and what beautiful children they
hadwith many other things of worthy memory,
which now shall die in oblivion, and thou return
unexperienced to thy grave.
THE DUEL.
It
was on a rainy September evening in the fall
of 18, that a group of men were seated round
the cheerful bar-room fire of the Planters' Hotel.
Among them were several from the country, who
were detained in town by the inclemency of the
weather, but the majority of the company was
composed
of citizens of Pineville. Uncle Hearty, who
generally presided on such occasions, was present,
and Sammy Stonestreet was there, to drink his share
of the rum, and to indicate to the rest the laughing
places in such stories as had become rather stale,
or in which the humour was not easily detected by
less experienced jokers.
The evening was well-nigh spent
notwithstanding
the company evinced no inclination to disperse,
while they freely mixed in conversation, and
entertained
each other with stories and anecdotes that
ever and anon elicited loud bursts of laughter; the
usual precursor of which was a shrill squeal from
Sammy, who beat the floor with his cotton-stalk, by
way of accompaniment. Sometimes Uncle Hearty
only evinced his risibility by a sort of asthmatic
wheeze in the throat, but when he rose above that,
and broke forth into one of his good, old-fashioned,
side-shaking laughs, the balance of the company
needed no better assurance that there was indeed
something to laugh at, and unanimously joined in
the chorus.
In the midst of this scene of social hilarity the
street door was opened, and a tall, dark-complexioned
man entered, and without ceremony seated himself
in a conspicuous part of the room. He was at once
recognised as no less a personage than Major
Ferguson
Bangs, and the customary salutation of good
evening, Major Bangs, was uttered by several at
the same time. The person thus addressed made
no reply; but, crossing his legs and cocking his hat
with a most impudent inclination to one side of his
head, contracted his thick, black brow, and, after
gazing insolently round the room, fixed his fierce
gaze upon the fire, and remained silent.
Never mind, gentle
men
, said Sammy, the
major's got his high-heeled boots on to-night. Go
on 'bout Gun Bustin gittin' into the waspses nest.
After the momentary interruption occasioned by
the intrusion, the story of Gun Bustin and the wasps'
nest was resumed, and Major Bangs left to indulge
in his revery of thought, uninterrupted by any
further
address. As the speaker proceeded with his
story, the major smiled a very incredulous smile,
occasionally uttering a loud ahem!and in the
midst of the general laugh that followed its
conclusion
,
he was heard to mutter something that had a
dn in it. But no notice was taken, by the
company, either of the clearing of his throat or the
muttering. At length the major's patience seemed
to have become wearied, and he determined to adopt
some surer means of attracting attention.
Accordingly
,
he turned abruptly round in his seat, and
fixing his gaze steadfastly upon one who was
relating
an anecdote in which himself was a prominent
actor, waited until the speaker drew to a close,
when, as the laugh died away, he exclaimed aloud
Doubts arising, sir!
The major was no stranger to the speaker, and
the remark was permitted to pass without notice.
But Major Ferguson Bangs was not to be foiled
in his attempt to provoke a quarrel. He became
more and more insolent, and seized upon every
opportunity to interrupt and insult the speakers, by
whistling upon a high key, and uttering such
exclamations
asBah!whew!that'll do for
the marines, and the like.
At length a few whispers were passed between
some three or four of the party, and a well-known
wag commenced an anecdote. Major Bangs
directed
his attention immediately to the speaker. As the
latter concluded, the major bent upon him a look
of most ineffable sarcasm, and exclaimedBah!
I'd like to know what you mean by that
insinewation
,
Major Bangs? demanded Ned Jones.
Doubts arising, sir! exclaimed the major, with
an oath.
Doubt who, sir?
Doubts arising, sir! reiterated the major in a
fierce voice, as he gave his chair a whirl from under
him and rose to his feet. That's what I mean,
sir! Take it up if you dare, sir! Do you know
Major Ferguson Bangs, sir? Take care, young
11*
man, how you play with the forked lightning!
Whew! and he gave his teeth a grind that was
distinctly heard in every part of the room.
I only axed what you meant, majorI don't
want to git into no fuss, replied Ned, apparently
half terrified out of his wits.
Fuss!bah! you asked what I meant. I've
told you, sir. You can pocket it, sirbut don't
know me the next time you see me. Do you
understand
,
sir? None but gentlemen are permitted
to know Major Bangs, sir.
Then pacing to and fro, the entire length of the
room, the major complacently observed the effect
of his blustering speech upon the crowd, and
casting
a searching look at the young man whom he
had so rudely insulted, and who was now engaged
in earnest consultation with several friends, in one
corner of the room, he exclaimed in a haughty tone
I despise a slink!
Who do you call a slink? demanded Jones.
Every dog knows his own name when he hears
it, sir, replied the major.
But look here, mister, I'll let you know I aint
no dogand I aint gwine to put up with no more
of your insolence, nether!
Insolence, sir! Thunder and furies, do you
know who you are talking to, sir?
Yes, I'm talkin' to Major Bumblusterbus from
Virginia, what got his horse's tail shaved at the Big
Spring Barbecue, when he was so drunk he didn't
know which eend to put the bridle on. That's who
I'm talkin' to; and if he don't sing small, the fust
thing he'll know he'll git the worst lickin' he ever
had in his life, rite here in this room.
As the speaker concluded he stripped off his coat
and placed it in the hands of Sammy Stonestreet,
who was now dancing about in an ecstasy of delight
at the prospect of approaching hostilities, while Uncle
Hearty was loud in his expostulations with the crowd.
Now, boyscome major, said he, turning from
one party to the other as he spoke, do stop it now
whar's the use of kickin' up a rumpus this here
time o'nightlook here nowlisten to your Uncle
Hearty, and take his advicehe's older than you all
iscome now, Neddycome, major, let's all take a
drink and drap it.
By this timewhether from the influence of Uncle
Hearty's harangue, or some other cause, we will not
pretend to saythe fiery major had become quite
docile, while the other party only grew more and
more hostile, until it required some three or four to
hold him off.
Whar is he? shouted Jones; jest let me light
on him, if you want to see how slick Georgia kin top
out old Virginy. Whoopee! I's the boy kin tame
your forket lightnin's! I'm the kuja Dick! the big
buck of the water! the Georgia stag! Whoopee!
don't hold me!
Oh, yes, sir, you've got your friends round you
now, and you can talk big, sir. Major Bangs can
be found when he's got his friends with him, sir, but
he don't fight everybody, sir, nor in a bar-room, sir.
He was now joined by three or four of the party,
who professed themselves his friends, and who
advised
him to challenge Ned Jones, which, they urged,
would be much the most genteel way of settling the
difficulty.
Oh, he's beneath my notice, said the major
I'll not dirty my fingers with him.
That will never do, major, remarked Bill Peters
they'll have it all over town before to-morrow
morning, that Major Ferguson Bangs was backed out
by Ned Jones, a man who everybody knows is the
greatest coward that ever lived.
Think I ought to call him out, eh, Peters?
To be sure I do; but I'm afraid there'll be no
such thing as getting honourable satisfaction out of
himfor I do believe he would quit the state before
he'd fight.
Well, sir, I'm of your opinion, sir,I'll
challenge
him to-morrow.
Now's the time to cut his comb, major.
Challenge him right here, now?
Yes, and you'll see how he'll drop his feathers.
Well, Peters, write out a challenge, and I'll blow
him to the dl, sir. How dare he call me Major
Bumblusterbus,a man belonging to one of the best
Virginia families, sirBumblusterbus! That word
will be the death of him, sir. Come, let's take some
liquor, and then we'll fix the challenge.
Accordingly, Major Bangs, with those who claimed
to be of his party, and our friend Sammy Stonestreet
who drank on this occasion as a neutralstepped
up to the bar, and, having drank success, pen,
ink, and paper were called for, and a challenge
drawn in due form, which was borne by Peters to
the adverse party. The challenge was promptly
accepted
,
seconds and friends appointed, and the hour
fixed for the meeting, which was to take place on
the following day, at ten o'clock in the morning, in
an old field at a little distance from the town.
Did he look scared? asked the major of his
second.
That he did,he turned pale as a sheet,
replied
Peters.
Has he a family, Peters?
No.
Well, that's fortunate, sir. I suppose he knows
I'm a dead shota perfect liner, sircut the cross
nine times in ten, on the word. But come, let's take
some more liquor.
Uncle Hearty announced that it was bed-time
for all honest people, and, after exhorting the
boys to go home and take a good nap, and try to
get up in a better humour in the morning, that worthy
old gentleman took his departure. Soon after the
party broke upthe more peaceable members to
seek their beds, while the major and his friends went
in search of pistols, bullet-moulds, powder, and other
necessary equipments, in the collection and
preparation
of which the balance of the night was spent.
Early on the following morning, Major Bangs was
seen blustering through the streets of Pineville, with
a pair of large duelling pistols under his arm, wrapped
in a red silk handkerchief. His friends had managed
to keep up the excitement by frequent libations
during
the night, and he was now full of
valour
and
distempering draughts.
Do you think he'll show himself on the ground?
asked the major of his second,have you seen him
this morning, sir?
No, indeedthe sun did not catch Ned Jones
in the county,
this
morning, if he had time to get
over the line before it rose.
Do you think he has cut out, sure enough?
No doubt of it, major.
Well, sir, I will have to post him as a coward,
you know. But I'd rather do that than take his life,
sir, and you know I'm a dead shot.
To be sure you are, major, and a gentleman of
honour.
Of the Virginia stamp, Peters.
Right, said Peterslet's take some liquor.
Notwithstanding the strict injunction of secrecy,
Sammy Stonestreet had spread the intelligence of the
approaching duel over the whole town, and, long
before the appointed hour, the best portion of the
male population were on their way to the place of
meeting, to witness the combat. As it drew near
the time, the major and his friends repaired to the
ground, where, greatly to his surprise, he beheld his
antagonist quietly seated upon a log, awaiting his
arrival. As Major Bangs observed Jones and his
friends busied in preparing their arms,
notwithstanding
his inner man was well fortified with some
half-dozen
glasses of brandy and water, there was a sudden
change in the expression of his countenance, and he
turned to his friend and remarked
Why, Peters, there he sits, cool as a cucumber!
Sure enough! replied Peters, with well-affected
surprise. Well, major, it will save us the trouble
of posting him, you know!
The major was, just at this crisis, afflicted with a
difficulty in swallowing, and before he had time to
reply, one from the adverse party called out
Gentlemen, are you ready to lay off the ground?
Why, it aint time for that yet, is it, Peters?
asked the major in a tremulous undertone.
Yes, sir, we on the part of Major Bangs, are
ready, replied Peters, without answering the major's
interrogatory.
Peters, said the major, grasping him hard by
the arm, and whispering in his earlet Dr. Jones
step it offhe's got the longest legsand tell him
to straddle his best, for you see I'm death on a long
shot.
The process of pacing off the ground was now
performed
with due formality. The pegs were driven,
and the articles between the belligerant parties read.
The principals were then called upon to cast lots
for the choice of position. The major trembled like
an aspen leaf, and his lips were colourless. The
cool deliberation of his antagonist increased his own
trepidation, and, like Bob Acres, he began to feel
his valour  ooze out at the ends of his fingers.
I'm told, said Peters, approaching with a loaded
pistol, that Jones is a dead shot on the third or
fourth wordso, major, your best chance is to draw
a quick bead.
The hll he is! gasped Bangs. Why didn't
you tell me that before, Peters? continued he in a
husky voice; have you got any liquor?
A bottle was produced, and the major made a
heavy draw upon its contents.
I'm not afraid to die, Peters, said he, as he
handed back the bottle, and his filling eyes rolled
wildly in their sockets, as if he were about to give
up the ghost without a fire. I aint afraid to die,
but somehow I feel sort o' curious. But it's not
because I'm afraid, Peters. There are some little
matters that ought to be fixed first, and I'd like to
live till my time comes. But, he continued,
grasping
his second by the hand, and vainly
endeavouring
to make a show of resolutionyou know
Major Bangs, Peters
To be sure. I know him to be a brave man,
and a man of honour, who would rather die than be
disgraced on the field by
Right, Peters, righttoss up for choice.
Up went the dollar, and as it whirled in the air,
the major called outHeads!
Heads it is! exclaimed Peters. The choice
is ours, major.
There was little or no choice in the ground, so
that the major found it a very difficult matter
to decide. By the aid of his second he was at
length enabled to make a selection, and,
staggering
to one of the pegs, took his position. Jones
was on the ground in an instantthe seconds
took their respective places, and the individual
who had been appointed to give the word
demanded
Are you ready, gentlemen?
Yes, answered Jones.
No! stop! yelled the major, scarce able to
keep his feet.
What's the matter? asked Peters, approaching.
Do you think Jones wouldn't make it up,
Peters
?
whispered the major.
What, major! We, the challenging party,
propose
a compromise! That would never do, you
know. There's no chance of an honourable
adjustment
of the matter now, unless they make the
proposition
to us. Remember, your
honour
is at stake,
Major Bangs, your sacred honour.
This appeal was sufficient, though it was very
evident that the major, like many others who have
found themselves in a similar
honourable
position,
would much rather have ventured his honour at
stake than his foot at that peg.
Right, Peterstell 'em to go ahead, said he,
concentrating his energies into one desperate effort
to stand erect.
Are you ready, gentlemen?
Yes, was the answer from both parties
Fire! (bang) one, two, three, (bang) four, five
stop!
Both pistols were dischargedMajor Bangs's
between
the words fire and one. After the
discharge of his pistol he could no longer stand,
but fell forward on both knees. A proposition was
then made, at his request, for a reconciliation. But
Jones was inexorable, swore that Bangs had
attempted
to dodge his fire, and that he would not leave
the field until blood had been drawn.
Load up again, boys, said he, in a voice loud
12
enough to be heard by Bangs, I'll tap his demijon
for him this time, now mind if I don't.
If I had a thought he was such a blood-thirsty
devil, I'd never challenged him, muttered the
major. I see it plain enoughI'm a dead man,
Peters. The muzzle of his pistol is as large as the
mouth of a Dutch oven, and he loads with
buck-shot
.
Oh, no, major.
I'm sure of it, Peters, for I heard 'em whiz
about my head like a swarm of bumble-bees. But
pass the bottle here, Peters, and I'll die like a man
of honour.
Just at this juncture Jones's second advanced
and desired to speak with Peters. The major,
strong in the belief that a proposition for a
reconciliation
was at hand, drew himself up, and assumed
a most valorous bearingall the chivalric sentiment
of his soul was pumped up for the occasion, and for
a moment he stood the impersonation of resolute
defiance
.
After a brief consultation, Peters approached
the major, remarking
Jones proposes, major, that as one shot has
passed between you without effect, and as he is
satisfied
So am I, interrupted the majorI'm
perfectly
willing
But hear me out, major. He says he's satisfied
that the distance is too great, and proposes to
reduce
it one-half.
I'll see him dd first! exclaimed the
disapappointed
major, all his feathers and his hopes
falling
at once. The bloody-minded devil wants to
git my head in the muzzle of his pistol.
The pistols were again loaded, and the parties
took their respective positions. All the major's
trepidation
had returned. As he took the pistol in his
trembling hand, he stared wildly into the face of his
second, muttering in a low, husky voice:
Farewell, PetersI'm a case.
Tut, tut, major, keep a stiff upper lip, and you'll
bring him this time.
On the next fire, Jones fell to the ground with a
deep groan! There was a rush to the spothis
breast was covered with blood!
Oh, my God! exclaimed Bangs, I've killed
him! Run, Peters, and call all the doctors in town!
run, for Heaven's sake, run! Oh, my Lord, what
have I done! The devil will get my soul for this!
I told 'em I was a dead shot.Why didn't
somebody
stop the duel? And away he dashed into
town, as fast as he could run, exclaimingI've
killed him!I've killed him!I told 'em I was a
dead shot!
An odd specimen of human nature was Major
Ferguson Bangs. A Virginian by birth, he had,
some years previous to the date of our sketch, found
his way to Georgia in the capacity of a negro trader,
and settled near Pineville. The major was a
successful
planter, but, though he possessed many broad
acres, and joined fences with several wealthy
neighbours
,
he had failed in all his attempts to join hearts
and hands with some one of their lovely daughters;
a circumstance to which some were disposed to
attribute
certain eccentricities of character in which
he was at times wont to indulge. When sober,
there was not a more sensible or better disposed
person to be found than the proud Virginia major;
but with him the old adage which saysWhen
wine is in, wit is out, was most strikingly verified.
Under the influence of liquor he became a very fool,
and, strange as it may seem, sought, on all such
occasions, to sustain the characterfor which of all
others he was least qualifiedof a fighting man.
He was tall, athletic, and masculine in features,
with a haughty curling lip; but with all these
attributes
of a bully, fight was not in his nature; nor
could all the stimulus his system was able to bear
infuse sufficient of the combative principle within
him to render him a hero. The major was
singularly
conscientious, and, perhaps, his greatest
weakness
was a firm belief in the supernatural. Drunk
or sober he lived in dread of ghosts and apparitions,
and those who knew him best were of opinion that,
coward as he was, he feared man less than he did
the devil.
The reader has already come to the conclusion
that the duel was a sham affair, and that the pistols
were loaded with powder only. Such was the fact,
though Major Bangs, important as was the part
sustained
by him in the performance, had been left
entirely
ignorant of the trick, and while the balance of
the
dramatis person
were enjoying the farce they
enacted, he was doing tragedy in good earnest.
Poor major! not only had he experienced what
it is to be shot at and missed, but now he felt the
mark of Cain as indelibly fixed upon his brow as
if it had been branded there with a piece of red-hot
brimstone, by the very old gentleman himself. He
had honourable friends, too, who stuck by him,
determined
to make the most of the occasion. They
drank his health at his own expense, and bragged
of his prowess, by which means they managed to
keep his imagination up to fever heat, during the
balance of the day. Indeed, between the influence
of liquor and the pathetic accounts which they
related
to him of Jones's dying agonies, he had
become
,
towards evening, almost frantic.
About dark, a message was brought to him from
Jones. It was an urgent request that he would
visit him before he died, and receive from him his
pardon and forgiveness.
No, no, gentlemen; I cannot bear to look at
the man I have murdered! exclaimed the major.
But, he says he aint got but a few minutes to live,
no how, and he wants you to come and see him, so he
wont die with no grudge agin anybody, said one.
Did he say so, boys?
Yes, major, and you better go and make it up
with him, and then you'll be apt to sleep better,
you know.
Sleep! exclaimed the major, glaring his eyes
wildly open, with a vacant staresleep!no, these
eyes will never sleep again, sirthese eyes
Oh, pshaw, major, come along and don't snap
'em so.
12*
Yes, come, major, said his second, who joined
to persuade him.
Is that you, Peters? Will you stand by Major
Bangs, Peters? Well, come, boysbut I'd rather
see the devil. Does he look bad, boys? for I can't
look at him if he does.
Oh, no, he looks pretty well, considerin' he's got
a ounce ball right through his guzzler vein
That all comes of being a line shot, interrupted
the major, with an involuntary shudder.
But you must shake hands and make it all up
with him before he dies, and then you'll feel better.
Besides, major, you know you killed him in an
honourable way.
Dn the honourable way!it all counts the
sameand the devil will make a blizzard of my
soul for it.
Taking the arms of two of the company, the
major
walked over to the long room to take a
parting
look at his unfortunate antagonist. Jones lay in
a bed with his head bolstered up until he sat almost
erect. His face was well smeared with flour, and
bloody cloths were profusely scattered about the
room. As the major came quaking to the door, it
was flung wide open, and the ghastly spectacle
burst suddenly upon him. Shivering with horror,
he shrunk back aghast, and with mouth distended
and eyeballs starting from their inflamed sockets,
stood for a moment as if transfixed to the spot,
while large drops of perspiration started to his brow.
His foot was braced against the threshold, and all
the force that could be applied to his broad
shoulders
was not sufficient to urge him into the room.
At length Jones beckoned him feebly with his hand.
The major flinched. Jones said in a low voice
I'mah, oh!I'm gwine, major!ah, to
oh!oh-o-o-o!
Let me go, boys! shouted Bangslet me
go! and with one desperate effort he shook them
off, and fled from the house. Had he remained a
moment longer, he would have discovered the trick
that had been put upon him; for Jones, unable
longer
to restrain his mirth, sprang from the bed and
joined in the laugh.
It had now grown late, and Major Bangs was
permitted to seek his lodgings without further
interruption
.
His room was upon the ground floor of an
out-house belonging to the hotelin it there were
several beds, but on this occasion he chanced to be
the only tenant. Filled with horrible imaginings
and gloomy fears, he sought his bed. He was in
no mood to be over nice, and as his boots
obstinately
refused to be drawn, he allowed them to
remain
his
hat and stock, being articles of minor
importance, were also permitted to occupy their
respective places. Thus half undressed, he threw
himself upon his bed, and endeavoured to find in
the arms of Morpheus a refuge from the upbraidings
of a guilty conscience. But
Instead of poppies, willows
Waved o'er his couch.
The horrid spectacle of the dying Jones was
constantly
before him, and when he closed his eyes to
shut out the fearful vision, horned devils with long
fiery tails danced and frisked around him, with
red-hot
tridents in their claws, as if ready to pitch him
into that unknown country, of which, in his youth,
he had been taught to entertain a very unfavourable
opinion. It commenced to rain, but the pattering
upon the roof was no opiate to him, and the
lightning
only afforded him horrid glimpses of demons
and devils as they skulked into the corners of the
room. The storm became more violentthe
lightning
blazed in upon his face, and the thunder shook
the foundations of the old building, while a rumbling
sound seemed to come up from the bowels of the
earth, as if it were about to open to receive him.
He heard the tramp of feet in his room, and
He felt his hair
Twine like a knot of snakes around his face,
as he beheld, by the fitful glare of the lightning, the
old king devil of all approaching his bed. He would
have prayed, shouted, fled, any thing, but his very
soul was frozen within him, and he sank powerless
upon his pillow. The demon approached, and,
placing
his cloven foot upon the bed-side, leaned over
and gazed down upon him with his eyes of fire.
The major's lips moved, but he had not breath for
a wordhe smelt the brimstone and saw the
demon's
horns. He remembered his grandmother's
charm for evil spiritsand he
thought
in the name
of the Lord, what do you want of me? but the
demon
only shook its head. In the desperate
extremity
of his fear the major grasped forward with both
hands. By chance he seized the hornsthe next
moment he was upon the floor struggling with his
satanic visitera moment after, he was fleeing
through the street, shouting and screaming, on his
way to the tavern.
Some five or six village gossips were seated round
the bar-room fire, when Major Bangs made his
entre
in the eccentric costume we have described.
Why, what upon yeath's the matter with the
major
?
exclaimed uncle Hearty, rising from his seat.
The major shook in every jointhis teeth rattled
and his eyes glared wildly about the room.
Why, major, what under heavens ails you?
inquired two or three in the same breath.
I'm right from hll! gasped the major. I
had him by the horns!I told 'em it would be so
keep him off, wont you, gentlemenwhere's Peters?
Pore feller! remarked uncle Heartyhe's
lost his senses. The boys has been projectin' with
him agin.
He was wet and cold, and it was quite evident
that his physical strength was fast sinking under the
terrible excitement of his mind. Humanity
suggested
that something should be done to check the
raging fever of his brain, or dangerous consequences
might ensue. Accordingly, he was conducted to a
bed and his comfort carefully provided for.
About noon on the following day the major made
his appearance in the bar-room, and desired to see
the landlord. His face was haggard and pale, his
eyes blood-shotten and heavy, and his countenance
still bore the traces of the dreadful fright he had
experienced
.
He seemed to have a confused
recollection
of the incidents of the past day, but on no
subject was his memory clear and distinct, except
in reference to his encounter with the devil. That
circumstance had made an indelible impression on
his mind, which his friends found great difficulty in
removingnor is he to this day clearly satisfied that
there was not some infernal agency in the matter.
He was duly informed of all the particulars of the
duelhow he had been drunk, insulting everybody
he met, and how that a few mischievous fellows had
made him the hero of a sham duel.
But, captain, said he, the devil?I saw
him, sir, last night, as sure as I stand here, sir.
You saw my old Billy-goat, replied the
landlord
.
You went to bed in the `long room,' and
left both doors open, and when the rain came on,
Billy sought shelter in your apartment.
Oh, but I smelled the brimstone, sir, as plain
as could be.
You smelled Billy's beard, major, which is quite
high flavoured, and might be taken for brimstone by
a man who would go to bed in his hat and boots.
Then you think it really was him I had the
tussle with, eh?
To be sure it washe is the only horned
gentleman
on my premises, I trust.
Well, replied the major, after a moment's
reflection
,
I've made a pretty considerable fool of
myself, sir, that's a fact. Have my horse brought
out, sir, and if ever you catch Major Ferguson
Bangs in another such scrape, sir, may the devil
get him sure enough, sir.
Major Bangs did not show himself in Pineville
for a long time after this event, and when he did
visit town again, he had but one quarrel, and that
was with the first man who asked him to drink.
He was never known to be drunk after the day of
THE DUEL.
THE FIRE-HUNT.
Samuel Sikes
was one of the most inveterate
hunters I ever knew. He delighted in no other
pursuit or pastime, and though he pretended to
cultivate
a small spot of ground, yet so large a portion
of his time was spent in the pursuit of game, that
his agricultural interests suffered much for the want
of proper attention. He lived a few miles from
town, and as you passed his house, which stood a
short distance from the main road, a few acres of
corn and a small patch of potatoes might probably
attract your notice as standing greatly in need of the
hoe; but the most prominent objects about Sam's
domicile pertained to his favourite pursuit. A huge
pair of antlersa trophy of one of his proudest
achievementsoccupied a conspicuous place on
the gable end; some ten or a dozen tall
fishing-poles
,
though modestly stowed behind the chimney,
projected far above the roof of the little cabin, and
upon its unchinked walls many a 'coon and
deer-skin
were undergoing the process of drying. If all
these did not convince you that the proprietor was
a sportsman, the varied and clamorous music of a
score of hungry-looking hounds, as they issued forth
in full cry at every passer-by, could not fail to force
the conviction.
Sam had early found a companion to share with
him his good or ill luck, and though he was yet on
the green side of thirty, he was obliged to provide
for some five or six little tallow-faced
responsibilities
;
so he not only followed the chase from choice,
but when his wifewho hated fisherman's luck
worse
than Sam did a miss or a nibbletook
him to account for spending so many broken days,
Saturday afternoons, rainy days and odd hours, to
say nothing of whole nights, in the woods, without
bringing home so much as a cut-squirrel or
horney-head
,
his ready reply was, that he was 'bleeged
to do the best he could to get meat for her and the
childer.
The Fire-Hunt was Sam's hobby, and though the
legislature had recently passed an act prohibiting
that mode of hunting, he continued to indulge, as
freely as ever, in his favourite sport, resolutely
maintaining
that the law was unconstitootional and agin
reason. He had often urged me to accompany him,
just to see how slick he could shine a buck's
eyes; and such were the glowing accounts he had
from time to time given me of his achievements in
that way, that he had drawn from me a promise to
go with him some of these times.
I was sitting one evening, after tea, upon the steps
of the porch, enjoying the cool autumnal breeze, when
my friend Sam Sikes suddenly made his appearance.
He had come for me to go with him on a fire-hunt,
and was mounted on his mule Blaze, with his pan
upon one shoulder and his musket on the other.
Determined to have every thing in readiness before
13
calling on me, he had gone to the kitchen and lit a
few light-wood splinters, which were now blazing
in his pan, and which served the double purpose of
lighting him through the enclosure, and of
demonstrating
to me the manner of hunting by night. As
he approached the house, his light discovered me
where I was sitting.
Good evenin,' major, said he, I've come out
to see if you've a mind to take a little hunt,
to-night
.
I believe not, Mr. Sikes, I replied, feeling
entirely
too well satisfied with my pleasant seat in the
cool breeze, to desire to change it for a night-ramble
through the woods. Not to-night, I thank you
it looks like rain.
Oh, 'shaw, 'taint gwine to rain, no howand
I'm all fixedcome, come along, major.
As he spoke, he rode close to the porch, and his
mule made several efforts to crop the shrubbery
that grew by the door, which Sam very promptly
opposed.
How far are you going, Mr. Sikes? I inquired,
endeavouring to shake off the lazy fit which inclined
me to keep my seat.
Only jest up the branch a little bitnot beyant
a mile from your fence, at the outside. Look at
him! he exclaimed in a louder tone, as he gave
the reins a jerk. Thar's deer a plenty up at the
forks, and we'll have r'al sport. Come, you better
go, and Why, look at him! giving the reins
another jerk at the same time that he sent a kick to
his mule's ribs that might have been heard an
hundred
yardsand I'll show you how to shine the
eyes of a buck.
As he sat in his saddle persuading me to go, his
mule kept frisking and turning in such a manner as
to annoy him exceedingly. Upon his left shoulder
he bore his blazing pan, and upon his right he held
his musket, holding the reins also in his right hand;
so that any efforts on his part to restrain the
refractory
movements of his animal was attended with
much difficulty. I had about made up my mind to
go, when the mule evinced a more resolute
determination
to get at the shrubbery.
Whoa! wha, now!blast your heartnow,
look at him!then might be heard a few good
lusty kicks. Come, major, git your gun, and
let's will you hold up yer head, you 'bominable
fool? and let's take a little roundit'll do you
good.
As I only go to satisfy my curiosity, I'll not take a
gun. You will be able to shoot all the deer we meet.
Well, any way you mind, major.
We were about to start, when suddenly the mule
gave a loud bray, and when I turned to look, his
heels were high in the air, and Sam clinging to his
neck, while the fire flew in every direction. The
mule wheeled, reared and kicked, and still Sam
hung to his neck, shoutingLook at him!whoa!
will you mind!whoa!whoa, now!but all
to no purpose, until at length the infuriated animal
backed to the low paling fence which enclosed a
small flower-garden, over which he tumbledSam,
pan, gun and all, together!
When Sam had disengaged himself, he discovered
that the saddle-blanket was on fire, which had been
the cause of the disaster.
Cus the luck, said he, I thought I smelt
something burnin'. Then addressing himself to
the mule in a louder tone, he continuedThat's
what comes o' jerkin' yer dratted head about
that-a-way
.
Blast your infernal heart, you've spilt all
my fixinsand here's my pan, jest as crooked as a
fish-hook!then there was a kick or two and a
blow with the frying-pantake that, you
bowdacious
fool, and hold yer head still next time, will
you? And you've skinned my leg all to flinders,
dadfetch your everlastin' picter to dingnation!take
that under your short ribs, now, will youwhoa!
I've a great mind to blow yer infernal brains out
this very night! And you've broke the major's
palins down, you unnatural cus. Whoa! step over
now, if you's satisfied.
By this time Sam had got the mule out of the
enclosure, and had gathered up most of his
fixins
.
The whole scene, after the upsetting of the
pan, had transpired in the dark, but from the
moment
I saw the mule's heels flying and Sam
clinging
to his neck, it was with the utmost difficulty I
restrained my laughter. During his solo in the
enclosure
I was absolutely compelled to stuff my
handkerchief
in my mouth to prevent his hearing me.
Did you ever
see
the likes o' that, major?
exclaimed
Sam, as I approached the spot where he
was engaged in readjusting his saddle and putting
other matters to rights that had been deranged by
the struggles of the mule to free himself from the
burning blanket.
I am very sorry it happened, I replied, as it
will prevent us from taking our hunt.
No, I'll be dadfetcht if it does, tho'I aint to
be backed out that-a-way, major, not by no means.
You know `a bad beginnin' makes a good endin','
as the old woman said. He isn't done sich a
monstrous
sight o' harm, nohow,only bent the handle
of my pan a little, and raked some skin off one o'
my shinsbut that's neither here nor thar. So if
you'll jest hold Blaze till I go and git a torch, we'll
have a shoot at a pair o' eyes yit, to-night.
I took the bridle while Sam procured a torch,
and after he had gathered up the fagots which he
had brought to burn in his pan, we set off for the
branchSam upon his mule, with a torch in one
hand, while I walked by his side.
It was only necessary for us to go a short distance
before we were at the designated spot.
Thar, said Sam, as he dismounted, here's
as good a place as anyso I'll jest hitch Blaze
here, and light our pan.
Accordingly Blaze was made fast to a stout
sapling
,
and Sam proceeded to kindle a fire in his pan,
at the same time explaining to me, in a low voice,
the
modus operandi
of the Fire-Hunt, which he
accompanied
with sundry precautionary hints and
directions
for my own especial observance on the
present occasion.
Now, major, said he, you must keep close
to me, and you mustn't make no racket in the
13*
bushes. You see, the way we does to shine the
deer's eyes is thiswe holds the pan so, on the left
shoulder, and carries the gun at a trail in the right
hand. Well, when I wants to look for eyes, I turns
round slow, and looks right at the edge of my
shadder, what's made by the light behind me in the
pan, and if ther's a deer in gun-shot of me, his
eyes 'll shine 'zactly like two balls of fire.
This explanation was as clear as Sam could make
it, shot of a demonstration, for which purpose we
now moved on through the woods. After
proceeding
a few hundred yards, Sam took a survey as
described
,
but saw no eyes.
Never mind, major, said he, we'll find 'em
you see.
We moved on cautiously, and Sam made his
observations
as before, but with no better success.
Thus we travelled on in silence, from place to place,
until I began to get weary of the sport.
Well, Mr. Sikes, I remarked, I don't see
that your bad beginning to-night is likely to insure
any better ending.
Oh, don't git out of patience, majoryou'll
see.
We moved on again. I had become quite weary,
and fell some distance behind. Sam stopped, and
when I came up, he said in a low voiceyou
better keep pretty close up, major, 'case if I should happen to shine your eyes, you see, I moughtn't
know 'em from a deer, and old Betsey here toats
fifteen buckshot and a ball, and slings 'em to kill.
I fell behind no more.
We had wandered about for several hours, and
the sky which had not been the clearest in the
commencement
,
now began to assume the appearance
of rain. I had more than once suggested the
propriety
of going homebut Sam was eager to show
me how to shine the eyes of a buck, and no
argument
or persuasion could win him from his purpose.
We searched on as before, for another half hour,
and I was about to express my determination to go
home, when Sam suddenly paused
Stop, stop, said he, thar's eyes, and
whappers
they is toonow hold still, major.
I raised on tiptoe with eager anticipationI heard
the click of the lockthere was a moment of
portentous
silencethen the old musket blazed forth
with a thundering report, and in the same instant
was heard a loud squeal, and a noise like the
snapping
of bridle reins.
Thunder and lightnin'! exclaimed Sam, as he
dropped gun, pan and all, and stood fixed to the
spotI've shot old Blaze!
So soon as he had recovered from the shock, we
hastened to the spot, and, sure enough, there lay
the luckless mule, still floundering in the agonies
of death. The aim had been but too good, and
poor Blaze was hurt past all surgery. Sam stood
over him in silent agony, and, notwithstanding the
bitter maledictions he had so recently heaped upon
him, now that he saw the poor animal stretched
upon the ground in death, and knew that his
infernal
picter would greet him no more for ever, a
flood of tender recollections of past services poured
over his repentant heart. He uttered not a word
until after the last signs of life were extinctthen,
with a heavy sigh, he muttered
Pore old cretur!well, well, I reckon I's done
the business now, sure enough. That's what I calls
a
pretty
night's work, anyhow!
A `bad beginning doesn't always make a good
ending,' Mr. Sikes, I remarked.
Cus the luck, it will run so, sometimes, said
he in a sullen tone, as he commenced taking the
saddle off his deceased donkey. I'm blamed if I
see how I got so turned round.
By this time it had commenced to rain, and we
were anxious to get home; but Sam had dropped
his gun and pan, as the awful truth rushed upon
him, that he had killed the only mule he possessed
in the world, and we now found it difficult to
recover
them. After searching about for near half an
hour in the drizzling rain, Sam chanced to come
upon the spot from which he had taken the hapless
aim, and having regained his gun and pan, we
endeavoured
to strike a fire; all our efforts, however,
to produce a light, proved ineffectual, and we
essayed
to grope our way amid the darkness.
Hello, major, whar is you?
Here!
Whar you gwine?
Home.
Well, that aint the way.
Why, we came this way.
No, I reckon not.
I'm sure we didn't come that way.
Whar, in the devil's name, is the branch?
petulantly inquired Sam. If I could only see the
branch, I could soon find the way.
It must be down this way, I replied.
Somehow or other I'm tetotiatiously deluded,
to-night, remarked Sam, as he came tearing through
the briers with his stirrup-irons dangling about him,
his gun in one hand and frying-pan in the other.
If I hadn't a been completely dumfoozled, I'd
never a killed Blaze like I did.
I volunteered to carry his gun, but he was in
no humour for the interchange of civilitiesstill
harping on his mule, he trudged on, grumbling to
himself
What, he muttered, will Polly say now
I'll never hear the last of that critter the longest day
I live. That's worse than choppin' the coon-tree
across the sittin' hen's nest, and I liked never to
hearn the eend o' that.
After groping through the brush and briers, which
seemed to grow thicker the farther we proceeded,
for some time, Sam stopped
I swar, major, this aint the way.
Well, then, lead the way, and I'll follow you,
I replied, beginning, myself, to think I was wrong.
Changing our direction, we plodded on,
occasionally
tumbling over logs and brush, until Sam
concluded that all our efforts to find the way were
useless.
Oh, thunderation! said he, as he tore away
from a thick jungle of briers in which he had been
rearing and pitching for more than a minute, it
aint no manner of use for us to try to find the way,
majorso let's look out a big tree, and stop under
it till morning.
Seeing no alternative, I reluctantly acceded to
his proposal.
Accordingly, we nestled down under the shelter
of a large oak. For a time neither spoke, and all
was still, save the incessant buz of the countless
hosts of musketoes that now seemed intent upon
devouring us. At length I broke silence, by
remarking
at
the same time that I gave myself a box upon
the ear, intended for the musketoe that was biting
me
I think this will be my last fire-hunt, Mr. Sikes.
The fact is, replied Sam, this 'ere aint very
incouragin' to new beginners, major, that's a fact
but you musn't give it up so. I hope we'll have a
better showin' next time.
My curiosity is satisfied, I remarked. I
wouldn't pass such another night in the woods for
all the deer in Georgia.
'Shaw, I wouldn't care a tinker's cus, said
Sam, if I only jest hadn't a killed Blaze. That's
what sets me back, monstrous.
That was indeed an unlucky mistake. I should
think a few such exploits as that would cure you
of your fire-hunting propensity. But I expect you
never had such luck, before to-night.
No, not 'zactlytho' I've had some monstrous
bad luck in my time, too. I reckon you never hearn
about the time I got among the panters.
Nohow was that?
Why, it was 'bout this time last fall, I and
Dudley
went out and 'camped on Sperit Creek. Well,
he tuck his pan and went out one way, and I went
another. I went shinin' along jest like you seed
me to-night, till I got a good bit from the camp,
and bimeby, shore enough, I sees eyes not more'n
forty yards off. I fotched old Betsey up to my face
and cut loose, and the deer drapped right in his
tracks, but somehow in my hurryment I drapt my
pan, jest like I did to-night when I heard old Blaze
squeel. While I was tryin' to kindle up a light,
what should I see but more eyes shinin' way down
in the holler. I drapt the fire and loaded up old
Betsey as quick as I could, to be ready for the
varmint
,
whatever it was. Well, the eyes kep comin'
closer and closer, and gettin' bigger and brighter,
and the fust thing I know'd ther was a whole grist
of 'em all follerin' right after the fust ones, and
dodgin' up and down in the dark like they was so
many dancin' devils. Well, I begun to feel sort o'
jubous of 'em, so I raised old Betsey and pulled at
the nearest eyes, but she snappedI primed her
agin, and she flashedand when I flashed, sich
another
squallin' and yellin' you never did hear, and
up the trees they went all round me. Thinks I
them must be somethin' unnatural, bein' as my gun
wouldn't shoot at 'emso I jest drapt old Betsey,
and put out for the camp as hard as I could split.
Well, we went back the next mornin', and what do
you think them infernal critters had done?eat the
deer up slick and clean, all but the bones and horns,
and a little ways off lay old Betsey, with four fingers
of buck-shot and bullets, but not a bit of powder in
her. Then I know'd they was panters.
Why, they might have eaten you too.
That's a fact. Dudley said he wondered they
didn't take hold of me.
The drizzling shower which had already nearly
wet us to the skin, now turned to a drenching storm,
which continued for more than an hour without
intermission
.
When the storm abated, we discovered
the dawn approaching, and, shortly after, were
enabled
to ascertain our whereabouts. We were not
more than five hundred yards from the clearing, and
probably had not been, during the night, at a greater
distance than a mile from the house which we had
left in the evening.
As we stepped from the wood into the open road,
I contemplated, for a moment, the ludicrous
appearance
of my unfortunate companion. Poor Sam!
daylight, and the prospect of home, brought no joy
to himand as he stood before me, with the saddle
and bridle of the deceased Blaze girded about his
neck, his musket in one hand, and pan in the other,
drenched with rain, his clothes torn, and a
countenance
that told of the painful conflict within, I could
not but regard him as an object of sympathy rather
than ridicule.
Well, said he, with a heavy sigh, and
without looking me in the facegood mornin',
major.
Good morning, I replied, touched with
sympathy
for his misfortune, and reproaching myself for
the mirth I had enjoyed at his expenseGood
morning, Mr. Sikes, I am very sorry for your loss,
and hope you will have better luck in future.
Oh, major, said he, it aint the vally of the
mule that I minds so muchthough old Blaze was
a monstrous handy cretur on the place. But thar's
my wifewhat 'll she say when she sees me comin'
home in this here fix? Howsomedever, what can't
be cured must be indured, as the feller said when
the monkey bit him.
That's the true philosophy, I remarked, seeing
that he endeavoured to take courage from the train
of reasoning into which he had fallen; and Mrs.
Sikes should bear in mind that accidents
will
happen
,
and be thankful that it's no worse.
To be sure she ought, replied Sam, but that
aint the way with hershe don't believe in
accidents
,
nohow; and then she's so bowdacious
unreasonable
when she's raised. But, she better not,
he continued, with a stern look as he spokeshe
better not come a caventin' 'bout me with any of
her rantankerous carryin's on this mornin', for I
aint in no humour nohow! and he made a
threatening
gesture with his head, as much as to say he'd
make the fur fly if she did.
We parted at the gate, Sam for his home, and I
for my bedhe sorely convinced that a bad
beginning
does not
always
make a good ending,
and I fully resolved that it should be my first and
last FIRE-HUNT.
14
THE ANTI-RAIL-RODE MAN.
The
time was when Judge Lynch exercised a
broad jurisdiction in and about the vicinity of
Pineville
.
His court claimed to be a
Court of
Iniquity
,
and took cognisance of, and punished all those
little delinquencies not otherwise provided for by
law, and no informality or lack of proof positive
screened the culprit from the infliction of his
summary
mode of punishment. The public constituted
the judge's grand jury, and just so sure as an
individual
,
by any indiscretion or impropriety of
conduct
,
rendered himself obnoxious to the community,
just so certain was he compelled to undergo the
sentence of the
Court of Iniquity
, without benefit
of clergy.
We have forgotten who was the first
rail-rode
man in Pineville, though we well recollect that
not a few passengers were conveyed out of the
corporate limits of the town, on a single
rail
, that
being the punishment in ordinary cases. We have
not, however, forgotten the first time that the judge's
sentence was successfully resisted and his power set
at defiance.
John Borum was given to drink, and when under
the influence of liquor was a very turbulent,
desperate
,
dare-devil sort of a fellow. On that day, John
had indulged to excess, and had got into numerous
quarrels, in one of which he fired a horse-pistol on
a small boy, who returned the compliment by
peppering
him with a full charge of shot from a
fowling-piece
.
The distance between the parties prevented
any serious damage being done, and but for the great
disproportion in the size and age of the antagonists,
the duel between John Borum and the blacksmith's
son would have passed off without notice. It soon
became a town talk, however, and as John went
staggering through the streets, swearing vengeance
and exhibiting his woundshis right arm and hand
having received several of the shothis conduct
tended much to increase the excitement against him.
Judge Lynch was not slow to make a decision in
the case, and, before dark, it was currently given
out that John Borum was to be ridden on a rail that
night.
Now, of all other men, perhaps, John Borum had
the greatest aversion to sittin' on a rail. He
would rather have died than suffer such an
indignity
;
and, immediately on receiving the intelligence,
he resolved that they should not catch him
sleepin'
berry sound. He took another large drink,
and, after clearing his throat, exclaimed in a
whining
tone of voice
Ride me on a rail!why I'll be dadfetcht if
I'd be rid on a rail not for five thousand dollars!
Well, you'd better put out, then, said the
gentleman of the
bar
, as he set back the bottle and
dropped the thrip into the drawer. Judge Lynch
has said it.
Well, now, I'm not a gwine to be sarved
no such trick, said John. Judge Lynch be
dd!
John sauntered out, sniveling and muttering to
himselfI'll blow 'em all to everlastin'
thunderation
,
if they come a projectin' about me!
He then stepped into Mr. Harley's and purchased
three pounds of powder, which he tied up in a silk
pocket-handkerchief. As it grew towards dark,
John, with his handkerchief under his arm, walked
into a confectionary and grocery establishment kept
by a quiet old Frenchman, where he purchased a
few cigars, and, lighting one of them, commenced
smoking. Already the officers of the high Court
of Iniquity were in pursuit of him, and as he saw
them gather round the door, he began to puff away
at his cigar, and mutter curses against the whole
infernal pack of 'em.
Yes, said he, you come tryin' that 'ere, and
you'll git waked up worse than you ever was afore
drat your infernal picters. You jest fool with this
childthat's alland if I don't blow you to
kingdom
comeyou see if I don't!
The crowd which had assembled round the door,
now gradually entered the room, and as they did
so, John flourished his cigar, and cried out
Jest you tetch, now! If you lay your hands on
me, I'll send you whirlin', if this here powder's good
for any thing. I don't care a cus for myself, nohow,
for I'd ryther be blowed through the roof of this here
store twenty times, than be rid on a rail once,a
confounded sight.
This last speech attracted the attention of Monsieur
Crapeau, who began to cast very uneasy glances at
John's wallet
Ha, what dat you shall say, sare?blow off de
roof from my house?
Lay hold of him, said the judge, who generally
attended the execution of his sentences in person
lay hold of him, boys!
Stand off! stand off! exclaimed John at the
top of his voice, holding up the powder in one hand
and the cigar in the otherDo you see this 'ere
cigar, and this 'ere powder?Well, jest you lay your
fingers on me, and I'll tetch 'em together quicker'n
lightnin'If I don't now, dad burn me!
Mon Dieu! Mon Dieu! exclaimed the
Frenchman
Go
out of my house, sare!begone before
one little minutewhat, le diable! will you blow all
up my properte?
Well, let 'em let me alone, then. I'll blow all
hands up, and myself too, before I'll be rid on a
rail!
Gather him up, boys, said the judge; the
sentence
of the law must be executed!
The crowd, which had now greatly increased in
number, gradually drew round the besieged
Borum
,
and the end of the rail was seen entering the
door.
Here goes, then! exclaimed John, drawing the
cigar from his mouth and applying it close to the
handkerchief.
There was a sudden rush to the door, and a
confusion
of voices crying outStop! stop!don't!
14*
don't!above all of which might be heard the old
Frenchman, cryingMurdare! murdare!
Well, said John, as the crowd dispersed, I'd
jest as lieve be blowed into everlastin' shoestrings
as be rid on a rail!
I tell you one, two, several time, begone vid
your pordareif you shall blow me up, I shall have
you hang, if you no begone from my house. Sacre!
devilment!
But Borum could neither be persuaded nor driven
from his position against the wall, until the old man
had persuaded the Lynch party to withdraw to some
distance from his door. He then left the house, much
to the relief of Monsieur Crapeaubut ever as the
crowd approached he would prepare to apply the
match. At one time they approached with more
than usual determination, and, when they had got
quite near, one was heard to sayBring the
rail!
You try it, now! said John, and if you don't
git yourselves into a hornet's nest, it'll be because
fire wont burn powdernow mind!
The circle began cautiously to close around him,
but as he knocked the ashes from his cigar, at the
same time producing a few sparks, preparatory to
touching it to the powder, he was again suddenly
left alone. The individual who had fatigued
himself
considerably by carrying the rail, in his sudden
retreat dashed it to the ground, and, exclaiming
Non comatible in statu blowupibus!
abandoned
the attempt. The balance of the
posse
soon imitated
his example, leaving John Borum triumphant.
Thus Judge Lynch, for the first time, witnessed
the utmost contempt for his authority, and the
successful
defiance of his power. John Borum
occasionally
got into difficulties afterwards, but
never was
ridden upon a rail!
THE END.